<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89609-0021 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-09-89.f2.A1020</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 110 / Friday, June 9, 1989 / Rulesand Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">24 CFR Parts 200 and 206</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-89-1415; FR-2481]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2501-AA67</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Home Equity Conversion Mortgage Insurance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Secretary, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This final rule adds a new Part 206 to Title 24, ChapterII of the Code of Federal Regulations. The rule implements section 417of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-242)which added a new section 255 to the National Housing Act (Act). Section255 authorizes the Secretary to carry out a program for insuring mortgageson the homes of elderly homeowners, enabling the homeowners to convertthe equity in their homes into cash. A total of 2,500 mortgages may beinsured under this program until September 30, 1991.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>July 24, 1989, except andSection;andSection; 206.205and 206.211 which have been submitted to OMB for approval. The approvalnumber will be published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> through a technical amendment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Judith V. May, Office of EconomicAffairs, (202) 755-5426, Room 8218, Department of Housing and Urban Development,451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410. (This is not a toll-freenumber.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>All except two of the information collection requirements contained inthis rule have been approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB)under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, as amended, and have been assignedOMB control number 2528-0133. The two new requirements have been submittedto OMB for review. Public reporting burden for each of these collectionsof information is estimated to include the time for reviewing the instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Informationon the estimated public reporting burden is provided under the Preambleheading, <T3>Other Matters. </T3>Send comments regarding this burden estimate orany other aspect of this collection of information, including suggestionsfor reducing this burden, to the Department of Housing and Urban Development,Rules Docket Clerk, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Room 10276, Washington, DC20410; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">1. Introduction</ITAG>On October 25, 1988, a proposed rule for the Home Equity Conversion MortgageInsurance Demonstration, also known as the FHA reverse mortgage program,was published in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> Twenty-two comments were received, includingthree from potential borrowers and one from an advocate of sales-leasebacks.Comments were also received from the American Association of Retired Persons(AARP), the National Council on the Aging (NCOA), the Mortgage BankersAssociation (MBA), the American Bankers Association (ABA), the FederalNational Mortgage Association (FNMA), the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation(FHLMC), the State of Connecticut (CN), the Rhode Island Housing and MortgageFinance Corporation (RIHMFC), the Virginia Housing Development Authority(VHDA), the Georgia Residential Finance Authority (GRFA), the Ohio Departmentof Aging (OHDA), Capital Holding Corporation (CHC), Riggs National Bank(RNB), Suncoast Schools Federal Credit Union (SSFCU), Eden Council forHope and Opportunity (ECHO) of Walnut Creek, CA, Catholic Social Service(CSS) of Tucson, AZ, and a consultant.In addition, a letter was received that was jointly signed by Senator BobGraham, Member of the Senate Committee on Banking, Housing, and Urban Affairs,Senator John Heinz, Ranking Minority Member on the Senate Committee onAging, Representative Don Bonker, Chairman of the Subcommittee on Housingand Consumer Interests of the House Select Committee on Aging, and RepresentativeEdward R. Roybal, Chairman of the House Select Committee on Aging (Congressmen).On the basis of these comments and further development of concepts in theproposed rule, the Department has made changes to the proposed rule whichare discussed in the following sections.<ITAG tagnum="84">2. Size of Demonstration</ITAG>By statute, HUD is authorized to insure up to 2,500 mortgages on the homesof elderly homeowners under the demonstration. FNMA, FHLMC, and ECHO expressedthe view that the size of the demonstration is too small and should beincreased to 25,000 (FNMA) or 30,000 (FHLMC). Since the limit on the sizeof the program is statutory, this concern cannot be addressed in the finalrule. However, the statutory limitation of 2,500 mortgages and the September30, 1991 statutory deadline for firm commitments are no longer specificallymentioned in the rule text. The Department has attempted to draft a rulewhich would continue to be suitable if Congress choose to extend the program,either in terms of volume or duration, without substantive changes. Ofcourse, the statutory limitations continue to apply unless changed by law,and HUD Handbook 4235.1, <T3>Home Equity Conversion Mortgages,</T3> will clearly state the limitations.The ABA expressed the concern that ``limiting the insurance program to2,500 mortgages will discourage many lenders who would otherwise be interestedfrom participating because their involvement would be limited to so fewmortgages that developing the expertise would not be productive.'' It recommendedconfining the program to ``those lenders that have already developed theirown reverse annuity mortgage programs.'' It is the Department's view thatsuch a policy would not be consistent with the statutory objective ``toencourage and increase the involvement of lenders and participants in themortgage markets in the making and servicing of home equity conversionmortgages for elderly homeowners.''<ITAG tagnum="84">3. Legal Authority</ITAG>Section 255(b)(3) of the National Housing Act limits the definition ofhome equity conversion mortgages to those mortgages which a lender is authorizedto make under one of three sources of legal authority: (1) Section 804of the Garn-St Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982, which empowersFederal regulatory agencies to issue regulations to exempt State-charteredlenders from restrictions of State law on alternative mortgage transactions,such as reverse mortgages, unless a State later excludes itself from section804 coverage; (2) other Federal law, such as the laws governing federally-charteredlenders, but not including section 255 of the National Housing Act; or(3) State law. This restriction was not expressly included in the proposedrule. It is included in the final rule to emphasize the fact that reversemortgages do not necessarily conform to the normal legal constraints applicableto home mortgage lenders, so that a lender may need to rely on speciallegal athority which overcomes the normal constraints. It is importantthat each lender participating in the program review and confirm its legalauthority to make reverse mortgages.RNB recommended that ``the HUD rule should specifically supersede any Statelaw or court decision that prohibits the compounding of interest. Statelaws that prohibit or are silent on the compounding question would inhibitfull implementation of the program.'' This final rule is intended onlyto implement section 255 of the National Housing Act, which does not empowerHUD to supersede laws which prohibit compounding of interest. The Federallaw designed specifically to address this question is section 804 of theGarn-St Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982, mentioned above.The Federal Home Loan Bank Board (FHLBB) is authorized to issue section804 regulations concerning all types of lenders except commercial banks(regulations to be issued by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency(OCC)) and credit unions (regulations to be issued by the National CreditUnion Administration (NCUA)); they appear as the Appendix to 12 CFR Part545. The FHLBB regulations authorize compound interest. HUD is currentlyseeking clarification regarding some ambiguities in these regulations.However, some States have exempted themselves from section 804 as permittedby law.Neither the OCC nor the NCUA regulations specifically mention the questionof compounding of interest. However, both agencies appear to have usedtheir section 804 powers to permit State-chartered lenders to make anyalternative mortgages, including reverse mortgages, which are insured byHUD. See NCUA policies published at 12 CFR 701.21(a) and (e), and OCC policiespublished at 12 CFR 34.3 (footnote 1) and 48 FR 40700.Two other Federal laws may be relevant. Section 501 of the Depository InstitutionsDeregulation and Monetary Control Act of 1980 supersedes State laws ``expresslylimiting the rate or amount of interest'' for many types of lenders; theimplementing regulations issued by the FHLBB appear at 12 CFR Part 590.This law may apply if compounded interest is regarded as usury under Statelaw. However, in some jurisdictions compounding of interest is prohibitedas a matter of public policy as a separate matter from usury. HUD is notaware of any official interpretation of section 501 addressing this situation.Section 529 of the National Housing Act is similar to section 501; it alsosupersedes State laws ``expressly limiting the rate or amount of interest.''However, its effect on compound interest is also unclear in those Stateswhich regard interest compounding as a prohibited practice distinct fromusury. Also, section 529 allows a State at any time to enact new interestrestrictions which supersede section 529. No regulations have been issuedto interpret section 529.Finally, it may be noted that some States have laws which exempt FHA-insuredloans from legal constraints which would otherwise apply, and some of theselaws may have the effect of overcoming restrictions on compound interest.Unfortunately, HUD is not in a position to make a blanket statement thatall State restrictions on compound interest are superseded for lenderswho make insured reverse mortgages. Lenders are urged to seek the adviceof competent legal counsel.<ITAG tagnum="84">4. Reservation of Insurance Authority</ITAG>In the proposed rule, HUD announced its intention to invite HUD-approvedlenders to apply for reservations of insurance authority prior to publicationof the final rule, so that it could train HUD-approved housing counselingagencies about reverse mortgages and their alternatives in those areaswhere lenders plan to originate mortgages. HUD allocated its 2,500 reservationsamong its 10 Regional Offices in proportion to each Region's share of theNation's elderly homeowners. On January 24, 1989, (54 FR 3564), the Departmentpublished a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> inviting lenders to apply for reservations ofhome equity conversion mortgage authority from their Regional Offices ofHousing. The notice contained application instructions for lenders andinitial distribution instructions for Regional Offices of Housing whichare not repeated in the final rule.Two changes have been made to andSection; 206.11 dealing with applicationsfor reservations of insurance authority. First, the restriction in andSection;206.11(b) that lenders may apply for reservations of insurance authority``for not less than 10 but not more than 50 mortgages'' has been replacedwith ``in accordance with instructions issued by the Secretary.'' Currentinstructions issued in the notice provide the reservations will be issuedin lots of 50. Second, andSection; 206.11(d) dealing with expiration and extension of reservationshas been amended to state that, if a conditional commitment has been issued,a reservation may be extended until the firm commitment for that applicationexpires. This is consistent with other FHA procedures governing the durationof conditional and firm commitments. This will enable a lender to haveup to nine months to complete the insurance application process. It isalso partially responsive to a concern expressed by the ABA that individualswho experience delays due to counseling should not be precluded from participatingand to a recommendation by GRFA that the reservations expire after ninerather than six months.<ITAG tagnum="84">5. Eligible Mortgages: Overview</ITAG>Sections 206.17 through 206.31 dealing with eligible mortgages have beensubstantially redrafted. The proposed rule could be read to suggest thatFHA proposed to insure three different types of mortgages. In fact, FHAintends to insure a reverse mortgage under which a borrower may initiallychoose among three basic payment options_tenure, term, and line of credit_andmay combine a line of credit with tenure or term payments or change thepattern of payments to accommodate changes in the borrower's circumstances.In addition, a borrower may elect to receive a lump sum draw at closingto pay off an existing mortgage, to pay off a contractor's lien for repairs,or for other purposes. Given these options, any FHA-insured reverse mortgageresembles a line of credit under which the pattern of payments may be changedand varied.In the final rule, the definition of ``principal limit'' has been clarifiedand will be used to calculate all payments to borrowers, including tenuremonthly payments. This change will have little impact upon the size ofa tenure monthly payment, but it will greatly increase the simplicity andflexibility of FHA-insured reverse mortgages. The AARP recommended that,``in the interests of consumer choice, * * * participating lenders be requiredto offer at least one type of tenure HECM (without appreciation-sharing)and one type of line-of-credit HECM.'' In fact, the final rule providesconsumers with a broader array of choices.<ITAG tagnum="84">6. Definitions</ITAG>A. Expected Average Mortgage Interest RateThe definition of ``expected average mortgage interest rate,'' also knownas the ``expected rate,'' has been changed for adjustable rate mortgages.The expected rate is used to calculate the principal limit for all borrowers.For borrowers who have selected an adjustable rate mortgage, the expectedrate is intended to be the market's best estimate of the average mortgageinterest rate during the term of the mortgage.In the proposed rule, the expected rate was defined as the lender's current15-year fixed rate or a comparable rate approved by the Secretary. However,not all lenders offer 15-year fixed rate morgages, and fixed mortgage ratescompensate lenders for certain risks which are not present in adjustablerate reverse mortgages. Section 206.3 of the final rule defines the expectedrate as the lender's margin plus the 10-year Treasury bond rate. The lender'smargin is defined as the initial mortgage interest rate minus the initialindex rate_i.e., the one-year Treasury rate. It is also required to bethe same margin used to adjust interest rates annually. This approach willdiscourage lenders from offering a teaser rate_i.e., an initial interestrate below the margin plus the index_because doing so results in a highermargin and consequently lower payments to the borrower. This definitionof the expected rate is more technically defensible because the 10-yearTreasury rate incorporates market expectations of future one-year interestrates, without including the inappropriate components of the 15-year fixedrate. It is also easier to adjust lender margins than the 15-year fixedrates.To illustrate, VHDA asked what expected rate State housing finance agenciesshould use, since they ``raise capital and set interest rates differentlythan do private lenders. Rates are set according to long-term bond pricesand may not reflect current market conditions.'' If State housing financeagencies offer FHA-insured adjustable rate reverse mortgages, they willbe bound by the definition of the expected rate in the final rule. However,they may offer a non-market rate by selecting a suitable margin over orunder the one-year Treasury rate and still accurately calculate the expectedrate for a particular mortgage.Rates shall be adjusted in accordance with the procedures in 24 CFR 203.49,as amended by andSection; 206.21 of the final rule.B. Maximum Claim AmountTo simplify terminology, the final rule eliminates the concept of ``maximumFHA claim amount,'' and defines ``maximum claim amount'' as the lesserof the appraised value of the property or the maximum dollar amount thatFHA can insure for a one-family residence in an area under section 203(b)(2)of the National Housing Act (as adjusted where applicable under section214 of the National Housing Act). Both the appraised value and the maximuminsurable amount are to be determined as of the date that the conditionalcommitment is issued. Closing costs will not be taken into account in determiningthe appraised value, but closing costs may be financed under the reversemortgage.CHC recommended that the program exclude homes with values in excess ofthe maximum dollar amount that FHA can insure in an area. Such a limitationon value was contained in section 255(d)(3) of the Act as originally passedby Congress, but it was recognized as a drafting error and eliminated bysection 1066 of the Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Assistance AmendmentsAct of 1988.MBA recommended that the maximum claim amount be increased substantially,and that, as an interim step, HUD should develop a second mortgage optionfor the program for homeowners who need help making their first mortgagepayments to stay in their homes. Both of these recommendations are beyondthe scope of the program as authorized by the Act.C. Principal LimitAt the time of the proposed rule, the Department planned to use separatefactors for calculating tenure payments and term and line of credit payments.It was subsequently determined that it would be easier to use a singlefactor to determine a principal limit for use in calculating all paymentsto borrowers. The definition of the principal limit has been modified toaccommodate this change. A unique principal limit will be calculated basedon the age of the youngest borrower, the expected rate, and the maximumclaim amount using a factor provided by the Secretary. (Because the mortalitytable in the payments model is truncated at age 100, it will underestimatethe life expectancy of borrowers over 95 years of age. For this reason,borrowers over 95 years of age will be treated as if they were 95 for thepurpose of calculating payments.)The principal limit is literally the maximum dollar amount that a borrowercan withdraw on the first day that a mortgage is in effect. It increaseseach month at a compound rate of one-twelfth of the expected rate plusthe monthly mortgage insurance premium (MIP). When the mortgage balanceequals the principal limit, the borrower cannot receive any more payments(expect as noted below), but is able to remain in the house until the borrowermoves, sells, or dies. A borrower who has selected the tenure option andwho becomes 100 years old will continue to receive payments even thoughthe mortgage balance equals the principal limit. Likewise, borrowers whohave selected the tenure or term options with adjustable interest rateswill continue to receive payments for the duration of the selected term,even though the mortgage balance exceeds the principal limit because theactual average mortgage interest rate exceeds the expected rate.The initial principal limit may be regarded as the present value of thepayments available to a borrower. Under the FHA reverse mortgage program,the borrower is able to control the timing of the payments by selectingamong three basic payment options: tenure, term, and line of credit. Theborrower may combine a line of credit with a term or tenure option andmay alter the payment plan initially selected.The Department believes that borrowers will value the flexibility affordedby the use of a principal limit since they cannot predict their futurecash needs with certainty, yet, by statute, are entitled to remain in theirhomes until they move, sell, or die. The Department believes that lenderswill also value the flexibility because the use of standard procedureswill reduce the cost of responding to the borrower's changing needs. Tocover these costs, lenders will be permitted to charge a fee of no morethan $20 each time that payments are recalculated. Detailed instructionsfor using the principal limit to determine payments are contained in HUDHandbook 4235.1.<ITAG tagnum="84">7. Payment Options</ITAG>New andSection; 206.19 describes the reverse mortgage payments options availableto a borrower. The description of the term option has been changed slightly:the duration of term payments is ``chosen by the borrower'' rather than``agreed upon between the borrower and lender,'' removing the unintendedimplication that the lender could veto a term selected by the borrower.CN asked whether the regulations could be written to permit gradually increasingmonthly payments. Such payments could be provided under the line of creditoption which permits any pattern of draws. In this case, the borrower wouldmake a one time request for a line of credit payment plan under which thelender would make monthly payments according to a schedule generated bythe lender. The payment schedule should be calculated so that the mortgagebalance equals the principal limit at the end of the desired term.<ITAG tagnum="84">8. Interest Rate</ITAG>New andSection; 206.21 provides that an FHA reverse mortgage may have a fixedor an adjustable interest rate as agreed upon by the borrower and lenderand modifies the proposed rule with respect to adjustable rates in responseto comments received from FNMA and FHLMC. Both secondary mortgage marketagencies expressed the view that line of credit payments to borrowers createexcessive interest rate risk for the lender, necessitating higher interestrates than for fixed payments. Since all FHA reverse mortgages may be regardedas line of credit mortgages, the Department has taken steps to reduce theinterest rate risk to lenders and investors, and so, cost to borrowers.The Department will insure reverse adjustable rate mortgages (ARMs) withand without interest rate caps. For capped reverse ARMs, the Departmenthas retained the five percentage point life-of-loan limit on interest rateincreases and decreases, but has increased the annual limit on rate increasesand decreases from one percentage point to two. The annual limit was changedfrom one to two percentage points to permit the interest rate on reverseARMs to adjust more rapidly to the market rate and so will reduce the compensationthat lenders will seek from borrowers for capped reverse ARMs.The Department will also insure a reverse ARM with monthly interest rateadjustments and no caps (except a maximum interest rate chosen by the lenderfor compliance with Section 1204 of the Competitive Equality Banking Actof 1987) as long as the lender also offers a comparable reverse ARM withannual interest rate adjustments and the above prescribed caps. Section1204 requires each adjustable rate mortgage loan to include a limitationon the maximum interest rate that may apply during the term of the loan.The Department has decided to offer an uncapped reverse ARM with monthlyadjustments for several reasons. Numerous studies have shown that a borrowermust compensate a lender by paying a higher margin (i.e., the spread betweenthe ARM rate and the index) for a forward ARM with annual and life-of-loancaps than for an ARM without caps. The margin increase depends on the shapeof the yield curve and the volatility of interest rates. Generally, lenderscharge more for caps when the yield curve slopes upward and interest ratevolatility is high than when the yield curve is flat or downward slopingand interest rate volatility is low.Lenders wil charge more for caps applied to reverse ARMs than to forwardARMs in all yield curve and volatility environments for two reasons. First,unlike forward ARM borrowers, reverse ARM borrowers have the option towithdraw funds (up to the principal limit) at any time. If interest ratesgo up above the cap, the borrower in effect has the option to borrow fundsat a below-market rate. While it is unlikely that all elderly borrowersin this demonstration would exercise this option in such circumstances,lenders will charge a higher margin for capped reverse ARMs than cappedforward ARMs because there is a risk that some borrowers would exercisethe option. Second, because reverse mortgage balances are initially lowand increase over the life of the loan, a lender receives more compensationfrom a margin in later years. Discounting this deferred income stream willcause the lender to charge a higher rate for caps on reverse ARMs thanon forward ARMs for which compensation is not deferred as far into thefuture.An uncapped reverse ARM with monthly adjustments is similar to a forwardhome equity line of credit with monthly adjustments. An uncapped reverseARM with monhly adjustments will have a lower margin over the index thanone with annual adjustments because the borrower's option to withdraw fundsat any time increases in value as the period between rate adjustments lengthens.In effect, annual adjustment places a cap on the rate for the year. Forexample, if rates were to rise rapidly one month after an annual rate adjustmentwas made, a borrower could receive a below-market rate loan for elevenmonths by withdrawing an amount up to the borrower's net principal limit.Again, it is unlikely that all elderly borrowers would exercise the option;nevertheless, the lender would price the effective cap created by the annualadjustment period based on some assumption about how the option may beexercised and would include the price of this cap in the margin. Indicationsare that the increase in the margin would be less for uncapped than forcapped annual adjustments; yet, neither is likely to be insignificant.Monthly adjustments to the interest rate would allow borrowers to be chargedthe lowest possible margin as interest rate risk is virtually eliminated.In summary, HUD believes that a lender will typically charge a lower marginfor an uncapped reverse ARM with monthly adjustments than for a cappedreverse ARM with annual adjustments because the margins include the costof the interest rate risk introduced by the caps and the adjustment period.By offering a lower margin (and consequently, a lower expected rate) foran uncapped reverse ARM, the lender provides the borrower with the opportunityto receive higher payments.Under a reverse ARM, payments to the borrower do not change when the interestrate changes. Thus, unlike forward ARM borrowers whose payments to thelender change with the interest rate, reverse ARM borrowers are protectedfrom ``payment shock.'' Adjustments to the reverse ARM rate merely increaseor decrease the rate at which remaining equity is consumed. It should alsobe recognized that a borrower with an uncapped reverse ARM may experiencea lower reduction in equity than a borrower with a capped reverse ARM.During inflationary periods with sustained high interest rates, when capswould otherwise be in effect, the equity consumed under an uncapped reverseARM would be offset by increased house value appreciation. During interestrate periods when the caps are not constraining, the more costly cappedreverse ARM would consume equity at a faster rate. Thus, the Departmentfeels that some borrowers may prefer the uncapped reverse ARM to the capped.Both will be offered under this demonstration.Section 255(d)(5) of the Act permits a ``fixed or variable interest rate* * * as agreed upon by the mortgagor and the mortgagee'' with no referenceat all to interest rate caps or frequency of rate adjustment. The Housebill permitted only fixed interest. The Senate bill also permitted variablerates. The Senate report does not discuss caps, but the Conference reportdoes, as follows: ``The conferees make clear that they intend that variableinterest should be capped at five points above the original rate * * *''without any mention of annual caps. Neither of the reports discusses frequencyof rate adjustment.Since the statute does not mention caps or frequency of rate adjustment,the Conference report statement has not been regarded as legally bindingon HUD. However, borrowers are protected as desired by the Conferees, sinceeach reverse ARM borrower will have the opportunity to choose a reverseARMs with two percentage point annual and five percentage point life-of-loancaps on interest rate increases or decreases. Assessment of acceptablerisk to HUD, within statutory restrictions, is a policy question committedto HUD's administrative discretion.The Department believes that increasing the adjustability of interest ratesfor a reverse mortgage is preferable to the options proposed by FNMA andFHLMC. These options were to offer nonconvertible term and tenure mortgages;to fix the interest rate at the time of each line of credit draw; and toestablish a new interest rate at the time of a change in a payment plan.The Department believes that each of these options is potentially morecostly to the borrower than capped or uncapped reverse ARMs for the followingreasons.If the Department agreed to insure term and tenure mortgages whose paymentplans could not be altered by the borrower, servicing costs_and consequently,interest rates_could be expected to rise, because borrowers may neverthelessexperience unanticipated needs for cash (e.g., money to repair the roof)that it will be in the lender's interest to meet. A lender faced with achoice between foreclosing upon a borrower for failure to maintain theproperty or advancing funds for repairs in most instances will prefer thelatter. But the decision to advance funds on a special exception basiscould often involve housing counselors, the HUD Field Office, and bankofficers, and would likely to lend to higher servicing costs than changesmade according to standard operating procedures. Of course, lenders couldignore the declining house value in hopes that any loss would not exceedthe maximum claim amount. By permitting the lender to advance funds forrepairs, HUD hopes to discourage this option.If the Department agreed to insure line of credit mortgages with interestrates fixed for each draw, a lender would have a sort of uncapped reverseARM, but would be required to treat each draw as a separate loan_again,resulting in higher servicing costs than when the adjusted rate appliesto the entire balance. In addition, special accounting rules would be neededto deal with partial prepayments_i.e., first-in, last-out; last-in, first-out;or weighted averaging. None of these are typical of current mortgage servicingpractices.Finally, if the Department agreed to allow the interest rate to changeon tenure or term mortgages at the time of a change in payment plan, thelender would have only partial protection against interest rate risk comparedwith the alternative of capped or uncapped reverse ARMs which permit theinterest rate to be adjusted at periodic intervals over the life of theloan. As a consequence, the lender should be able to offer a capped oruncapped reverse ARMs at a lower cost to the borrower than the proposedoption.One commentator recommended the creation of a price-level-adjusted reversemortgage. Such an option was considered, but rejected as beyond the scopeof this program.The requirements for disclosure of the adjustable rate features of a mortgagehave been revised for two reasons. First, the proposed rule assumed thatsome insured mortgages would be ``closed end'' credit for purposes of Truth-in-Lendingregulations, which is no longer the case. HUD has received written advicefrom the Division of Consumer and Community Affairs of the Federal ReserveBoard that all insured mortgages under the final rule will constitute openend credit. Second, Congress has passed the Home Equity Loan Consumer ProtectionAct of 1988 to cover disclosures for ``open end'' credit. The final ruleprovides for basic pre-loan disclosures similar to the regular FHA ARMprogram until the new law is implemented. The new law will require veryextensive disclosure and will eliminate the need for any separate HUD pre-loandisclosure requirements. HUD will apply its regular FHA ARM policy requiring25 days advance disclosure of interest rate adjustments since the new ConsumerProtection Act does not mandate any advance disclosure.<ITAG tagnum="84">9. Shared Appreciation</ITAG>Section 206.23 provides that any mortgage may provide for shared appreciationbetween the borrower and the lender as long as the lender also offers acomparable mortgage without shared appreciation. This differs from theproposed rule under which shared appreciation was permitted only for fixed-ratetenure mortgages. Both the AARP and NCOA urged that shared appreciationbe offered for term as well as tenure mortgages. Since it is the Department'sintention to insure a reverse mortgage under which the borrower may chooseamong payment options, there is no reason to deny borrowers who chooseshared appreciation the flexibility available to those who do not. Thefinal rule corrects an oversight in the proposed rule by clarifying thatappreciation will be measured by appraised value rather than sales pricewhen no sale has occurred at the time the loan is repaid.<ITAG tagnum="84">10. Initial Payment</ITAG>The proposed rule placed a limit on the size of an initial payment to theborrower used to pay off an existing lien or to make repairs. Under thefinal rule in andSection; 206.25(a), the size of any initial payment is limitedonly by the principal limit, and there are no limitations on the purposesfor which it may be used. This change is consistent with the recommendationsof the AARP, NCOA, and GRFA.It is evident that some borrowers will be able to increase their cash flowby paying off existing mortgages. Others may use a reverse mortgage asa deferred payment rehabilitation loan: Some will choose to make the repairsbefore closing to take advantage of any resulting increase in their home'sappraised value, and others, after closing, under a line of credit or theprovisions of andSection; 206.47.<ITAG tagnum="84">11. Calculation of Payments</ITAG>Unlike the proposed rule, the final rule provides that a line of creditmay be combined with term and tenure monthly payments. Term and tenuremonthly payments are both calculated in the same way, except that the numberof months used in the calculation for term payments is the number of monthsselected by the borrower, while for tenure payments it is the age of theyoungest borrower subtracted from 100 and multiplied by 12. At origination,the principal limit is reduced by any initial payment and any amounts set-asidefor a line of credit, for repairs after closing, and for the first year'spayments of taxes, insurance, and other property charges. Then, monthlypayments are calculated by determining the future value of the net principallimit at the end of the applicable number of months using a monthly compoundingrate of one-twelfth of the expected rate plus the monthly MIP. This futurevalue and the monthly compounding rate are used in a sinking fund formulafor payments made at the beginning of a month to determine the maximummonthly term or tenure payment.As long as the mortgage balance is less than the principal limit, a borrowermay request a payment of any amount up to the principal limit or may changefrom one payment option to another. If the borrower changes payment optionsor makes a lump sum draw, a lender will recalculate payments to the borrowerusing a method similar to the one described above. Specifically, the lenderwill subtract the mortgage balance (and any unused amount set-aside fora line of credit or for other purposes) from the principal limit for thecurrent month, project the net principal limit to the end of the term,and use a sinking fund formula to recalculate monthly payments, if any.The final rule provides that a lender may charge a fee, not to exceed twentydollars, to change a borrower's payment plan.Factors and detailed instructions for making these calculations are containedin HUD Handbook 4235.1. Computation screens for use on a personal computerare available from a computer bulletin board maintained by the HousingInformation and Statistics Division in the Office of Housing. The screens(including the factors) and payments model can be downloaded using thecaller's personal computer and communications software by telephoning (202)755-3102, selecting the HECM menu option, and following the instructionson the screen. Technical assistance is available by calling the HousingInformation and Statistics Division (202) 755-6190. (These are not toll-freenumbers.)<ITAG tagnum="84">12. Size of Payments</ITAG>The Congressmen, AARP, NCOA, and ECHO all urged that an effect be madeto maximize payments to borrowers by fine-tuning the assumption used inthe payments model. A technical explanation of the payments model was providedin the preamble to the proposed rule and is not repeated here. In additionto the mortality data (1979-81 female mortality tables, based on Censusdata and published by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services),the model uses four critical assumptions. These assumptions and their valuesfor the program are: The expected appreciation rate, .04; the varianceof the appreciation rate, .01; the mortgage termination rate (i.e., terminationsdue to death, move-outs, and refinancings), 1.3 times the mortality rate;and the discount rate, which is set equal to the mortgage interest rateminus 50 basis points (one-half percentage point). The values for theseassumptions were selected after extensive research, and they will be refinedfollowing the demonstration once data from the program are analyzed. Theyrepresent the Department's best estimates given the counterbalancing objectivesof maximizing payments to borrowers and designing an actuarially soundprogram.CHC questioned the use of population mortality rather than annuitant mortalityrates:<ITAG tagnum="21">Just as a person who did not anticipate that they would have a substantialadditional life expectancy would not be likely to apply for a life annuity,so an individual who did not anticipate living in their home for a substantialadditional period of time would not be likely to go through the time andexpense of applying for a home equity conversion mortgage. This self-exclusionof the more high risk and ill portion of the elderly population makes theuse of annuitant mortality tables necessary to make the program actuariallysound.</ITAG>The Department rejects this argument on the grounds that the initial costof a home equity conversion mortgage is much lower than the cost of a lifeannuity, so that it is likely that the program will appeal to a broadersegment of the elderly homeowner population than those who expect to belong-lived. Some may use a reverse mortgage proceeds for a short time untilthey can make another living arrangement. Some elderly homeowners who areill or infirm may use reverse mortgage proceeds to purchase long-term careor other services to make their final years more comfortable. How borrowermortality rates compare with those of the general population will be amongthe topics studied in the course of the program.CSHA asked whether a lender must use the age of the youngest borrower orcould use joint mortality tables. For ease of administration, the Departmentis requiring use of the age of the youngest borrower. GRFA recommendedthat the payments model take the gender of the borrower into account. Gender-specifictables cannot be used because the Civil Rights Act of 1968, as amendedin 1976, forbids discrimination on the basis of sex in the terms and conditionsof a mortgage. Use of female mortality tables introduces an element ofconservatism into the payment model's assumptions; however, a large majorityof borrowers are expected to be female.<ITAG tagnum="84">13. Treatment of Houses With Values in Excess of Maximum Claim Amount</ITAG>By statute, Congress placed a limit on the maximum insurance claim thatFHA can pay under the program. As a consequence, FHA will insure a reversemortgage on a house of any value, but, for purposes of determining paymentsto borrowers, will disregard any house value above the maximum claim amount.HUD believes that limiting benefits available to borrowers whose housevalues exceed the maximum claim amount will have the salutary effect ofencouraging the development of conventional reverse mortgages to complementthose insurable under the FHA program.Several commentators recommended special treatment of borrowers whose housevalues exceeded the maximum claim amount. CSHA recommended that HUD adoptone of the following: (1) Charge a lower MIP to elderly homeowners withhouses above the maximum, (2) limit the liability of the borrower to aninitial equity of $101,250 plus appreciation, or (3) raise payments toall borrowers by taking into account the insurance of higher valued properties.AARP and NCOA also recommended charging a lower MIP. AARP, NCOA, ECHO,and the Congressmen also supported permitting borrowers to withhold a portionof their equity for later use by themselves or their heirs.The Department believes that borrowers with house values in excess of themaximum claim amount should not be treated differently from others. Neithercharging a lower mortgage insurance premium nor permitting them to withholda portion of their equity is practical or consistent with the apparentCongressional intent to limit benefits to elderly homeowners under theFHA reverse mortgage program. Charging a lower MIP would require redesignof the program since it is by holding the MIP structure constant that thepayments model is able to solve for the unique principal limit that equatesthe present value of the expected MIP with the present value of the expectedlosses.Permitting equity withholding is without precedent in FHA experience andwould effectively give the homeowner or some other creditor of the homeownera lien superior to the reverse mortgage. The statute requires the insuredmortgage to be a first mortgage. In the case of long-lived borrowers inmoderately appreciating houses, FHA would be in the position of payinginsurance claims even though proceeds from the sale of the property exceededthe mortgage balance at the time that the mortgage became due and payable.Within the bounds of the program's design, however, the objective of equitywithholding can be partially achieved. Under the final rule, a homeownerhas the opportunity to combine a line of credit with term and tenure paymentsand effectively to withhold equity until such time as the homeowner choosesto draw upon it.Raising payments to all borrowers by taking into account the insuranceof high valued properties would also conflict with FHA practice. FHA insureslenders against default by borrowers with mortgages that meet FHA underwritingstandards. Payments to a borrower with a reverse mortgage are uniquelybased upon the age of the youngest borrower, the expected rate, and themaximum claim amount. The payments model sets the present value of theMIP expected to be collected equal to the present value of the losses expectedto be incurred to solve for a unique principal limit for a borrower withthe specified characteristics. The program does not take into account assumptionsabout the proportion of houses of different values in the pool of mortgagesinsured. It is not designed as a subsidy program under which some borrowerspay more so that other borrowers can receive higher payments. Each borroweris paying a premium which is estimated to be sufficient to compensate theinsurer for the risks of the particular mortgage. From a practical pointof view, it is impossible to know what the composition of house valuesin the pool of insured mortgages will be. In the beginning, the proportionof high-valued properties may be relatively high, but their proportionshould decline as private lenders and insurers develop products that permitowners of these properties to take fuller advantage of their equity.Apart from the practicality of the individual recommendations, making theprogram more attractive to homeowners whose houses exceed the maximum claimamount would decrease the incentive to private lenders and insurers toprovide conventional reverse mortgages. For these reasons, the recommendationshave not been adopted.<ITAG tagnum="84">14. Mortgage Provisions</ITAG>A. Mortgage FormsSection 206.27(a) states that: ``The mortgage shall be in a form meetingthe requirements of the Secretary.'' MBA and ABA recommended that HUD developstandardized mortgage forms for use by lenders. HUD will develop standardizedmortgage provisions for use in mortgage forms developed by the lender.The mortgage forms will consist of a security instrument of the type typicallyused in the jurisdiction (mortgage or deed of trust), a promissory note,and a loan agreement specifying the lender's obligation to advance funds.B. Timing of Payments to BorrowersSection 206.27(b)(1) makes it clear that monthly payments to borrowersshall be mailed to the borrower or transferred to the account of the borroweron the first business day of each month beginning with the first monthafter closing. Line of credit draws shall be mailed or transferred withinfive business days after the lender has received a written request forpayment.FNMA requested that the lenders have 10 business days in which to makea line of credit payment. HUD believes that mortgage servicers should beable to advance payments to borrowers and receive reimbursement from investors,reducing the time that would otherwise be needed to complete the transaction.C. Amount of Hazard InsuranceABA recommended that andSection;206.27(b)(2) should be amended ``so thatthe borrower is required to maintain hazard insurance on the property inan amount acceptable not only to HUD but also to the lender.'' This changehas been made.D. Property MaintenanceSection 206.27(b)(5) provides that: ``The borrower must keep the propertyin good repair.'' ABA recommended that the mortgage ``be structured soas to ensure adequate maintenance of the property.'' RNB suggested that``a drive-by inspection of the property should qualify to determine thatthe property is in proper repair. Only if the drive-by indicates problems,should further investigation of the premises be required.'' CHC observed:<ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed rules do not provide lender motivation to enforce (HUD's)property standards because the Department will suffer any loss up to themaximum FHA claim amount before lenders lose anything * * *. We suggestthat lender be required to regularly recertify, under penalty of potentialloss of their FHA insurance, that the property is being maintained.</ITAG>HUD requires that properties meet Minimum Property Standards at the timethat they are insured and permits lenders to foreclose if borrowers failto keep their property in good repair. The Department believes that borrowerswill have a strong incentive to maintain their property throughout theduration of most mortgages, because sales proceeds in excess of the mortgagebalance belong to the borrower or the estate of the borrower. The Departmentfurther believes that imposing an affirmative obligation upon a lenderto inspect insured properties at regular intervals would be too costly.Instead, the Department has increased the borrower's ability to make lumpsum withdrawals under a reverse mortgage, and so, in this way, enhancedthe borrower's ability to maintain the property.E. Payment of Property ChargesSections 206.27(b)(6) and 206.205 deal with the payment of taxes, insurancepremiums, and other property charges. The borrower is responsible for thesepayments, but may choose to have the lender pay them with money withheldfrom the borrower's monthly payments or charged to the borrower's lineof credit. These payments are not made from an escrow account, as providedin the proposed rule. Instead, the payments will be added to the mortgagebalance at the time that they are made, as explained in revised andSection;206.205.MBA recommended that borrowers be required to establish escrows for taxesand insurance. This recommendation is not practicable because some borrowerswill withdraw the maximum allowed on the first day or will reach the principallimit sooner than others and will be responsible for making these paymentsfrom their own funds as long as they reside in the property.F. Preservation of First LienRNB recommended ``that to protect both lenders and HUD, HUD should pre-emptall State mechanics liens and State lien statutes (taxes, utility, etc.)that could affect the lien priority of the lender and HUD on the property.''While HUD cannot pre-empt these State laws, andSection; 206.27(b)(10) requiresthe lender to take affirmative action to preserve the mortgage's firstlien status if State law limits the lien originally executed and recordedto a maximum amount of debt or a maximum number of years and further requiresthe lender to cause any other liens to be removed or subordinated. ManyStates require that a mortgage state a maximum principal amount which willbe secured by the mortgage, and at least one State (Florida) limits theperiod during which loan advances after closing retain the original lienpriority. The borrower can avoid foreclosure and continue to receive paymentsby signing necessary documents prepared by the lender and by keeping theproperty clear of other liens unless the junior lienholder agrees to besubordinated to the entire insured mortgage.G. Lender's Late FeeSection 206.25(g) clarifies the lender's late fee which is owed to theborrower if a monthly payment or requested line of credit payment is notmailed to the borrower or transferred to the borrower's account on time.The proposed rule would have required the lender to pay a 10 percent latecharge for any late payment. The charge would have been due as soon asthe payment was one day late and would not have increased in case of longerpayment delays. HUD continues to believe that a ``grace period'' is inappropriate,so that a late charge should be imposed immediately. However, HUD has alsodetermined that the late charge will be a more effective incentive forprompt payment if it increases as the length of the payment delay increases.Thus, the final rule adds to the basic 10 percent late charge a continuinglate charge on the late payment calculated daily at a rate equivalent tothe mortgage interest rate, subject to a cap of $500.H. Due and PayableNCOA and RNB asked that the preamble to the final rule discuss the variousbases for determining when a reverse mortgage becomes due and payable underandSection; 206.27. These matters are dealt with in detail in HUD Handbook4235.1.<ITAG tagnum="84">15. Allowable Fees and Charges</ITAG>MBA expressed concern about the limitations on allowable fees, statingthat:<ITAG tagnum="21">Mortgage bankers generally receive a substantial portion of theirincome from the servicing of mortgages. For example, for their duties inservicing FHA and VA mortgages, they receive 44 basis points to cover theircosts and to create revenue for their companies. With the home equity conversionmortgage, such fees will not be available because of the structure of theprogram.</ITAG>As a solution, MBA recommended permitting higher origination fees or discountpoints or permitting all mortgagees to share MIP income, not just thosechoosing the share premium option.VHDA and RIHMFC feared that the prohibition against charging discount pointsmight limit a lender's ability to sell reverse mortgages in the secondarymarket. FHLMC recommended that HUD allow ``an explicit servicing fee tobe charged against each payment under a HECM.''The Department does not support using MIP for purposes other than mortgageinsurance, charging unearned interest_i.e., discount points, or chargingorigination fees in excess of actual costs. It does acknowledge, however,that the traditional method for setting a servicing fee for forward mortgages_namely,as a fixed percentage of the outstanding principal balance_is unlikelyto work for reverse mortgages, because initial balances are generally low,reducing initial servicing income. In addition, servicers would demandhigher fees to cover the risk that, due to unanticipated prepayments orunderutilization of lines of credit, they would not recoup their out-of-pocketcosts before a mortgage was assigned to HUD. Since a servicer's costs aremost logically and economically covered by a flat monthly fee for the actualcost of the service, it was decided to set aside andSection; 203.552(a)(12)of the basic FHA regulations which precludes a post-endorsement fee toa borrower for ``charges for servicing activities of the mortgagee or servicer.''Section 206.207(b) permits a mortgagee or servicer to charge a flat monthlyfee set at the time of loan origination to compensate them for their costs.The department has been assured by FNMA and FHLMC that this policy willresult in significant reductions in the interest rate that may be chargedto borrowers and so will not affect the payments received by borrowers.A mortgagee may choose whether to receive compensation for mortgage servicingas an implicit fee included in the interest rate or as an explicit flatmonthly fee charged to the borrower. If the latter is chosen, the amountof the fee must be fixed at loan origination, disclosed to the borrower,and included in the loan agreement. If a servicing fee is charged to theborrower, the lender will reduce the principal limit used to calculatepayments to borrowers by an amount sufficient to fund the fee for the durationof the mortgage. The fee will be charged to the borrower's mortgage balanceonly as it is earned by the lender or servicer.It is believed that permitting a post endorsement fee for servicing willbenefit all parties to the transaction. Servicers will be compensated forthe cost of services performed. Borrowers will pay a servicing fee onlyas services are received. In addition, they will pay a lower interest ratethan would otherwise be charged, qualifying them for higher payments. Tocompare reverse mortgages with and without servicing fees, a borrower needfocus only upon the size of the payments that the lender is offering. Thehigher the payments, the lower the cost to the borrower.<ITAG tagnum="84">16. Eligible Borrowers</ITAG>A. Minimum AgeSection 206.33 states that, to be eligible, the youngest borrower mustbe 62 years of age. CSHA asks whether individual lenders can set higherage limits? A lender may not since the statute states that elderly homeownersmust be ``at least 62 years of age or such higher age as the Secretarymay prescribe,'' and the Secretary has not chosen to change the age inthe statute.B. General Credit StandingSection 206.37 requires that a borrower have ``a general credit standingsatisfactory to the Secretary.'' VHDA, RIHMFC, and RNB asked for an explanationof this requirement. As spelled out in HUD Handbook 4235.1, borrowers willbe asked to show that they are not currently in default with regard toany debt that they owe the Federal Government. It is understood that manyapplicants will be applying for a reverse mortgage to pay off other delinquentaccounts. Certain financial information will be collected from borrowersusing a standard mortgage credit analysis form to facilitate evaluationof the program.C. Principal ResidenceSection 206.39 defining ``principal residence'' has been revised to clarifythe eligibility of borrowers with institutionalized spouses. Concern withthis matter was expressed by AARP, NCOA, VHDA, RIHMFC, GRFA, and the Congressmen.RNB recommended that: ``The lender should be able to send a certificationto the borrower to sign to ascertain whether the residence is the principalresidence and occupied by the borrower.'' A new andSection; 206.211 has beenadded requiring lenders to determine on an annual basis whether or notthe property is the principal residence of at least one borrower. A borrowerwill be asked to so certify, and the lender may rely on the certificationunless it has information indicating that the certification may be false.This section is also responsive to a concern expressed by CHC that theDepartment needs a way of ascertaining whether the borrower has moved ordied in order to prevent fraud.D. CounselingSection 206.41 deals with counseling. CHC and SSFCU opposed mandatory counselingby a HUD-approved housing counseling agency. CHC suggested that ``the counselof any adult advisor who is not connected with the lender and whose counselis trusted by the prospective borrowers should be acceptable to the Department.''In addition, CHC claimed that the counseling requirement ``amounts to achallenge to the senior's right and ability to contract.''The statute authorizing the program requires that the borrower receive``adequate counseling by a third party (other than the lender)''; and thatthe lender ``make available to the homeowner * * * a written list of thenames and addresses of third-party information sources who are approvedby the Secretary as responsible and able to provide the information required'';and that ``the Secretary shall provide or cause to be provided by entitiesother than the lender'' certain specific items of information which ``shallbe discussed with the borrower.'' These passages amply support the conclusionthat Congress intended borrowers to receive counseling from HUD-approvedcounseling agencies.OHDA expressed strong doubt regarding the ability of HUD-approved counselingagencies to provide reverse mortgage counseling, and asked how HUD wouldapprove other agencies for reverse mortgage counseling. ABA and VHDA recommendedthat HUD expedite the approval of additional counseling agencies. HUD hastaken several steps consistent with these recommendations. First, on December2, 1988, Assistant Secretary Thomas T. Demery sent a memorandum to HUDRegional and Field Offices authorizing them to approve additional counselingagencies that specialize in reverse mortgage counseling as long as theymeet the other requirements for counseling agencies spelled out in HUDHandbook 7610.1 REV.Second, under an Interagency Agreement with HUD, the Administration onAging (AoA) is enlisting the assistance of its Regional Offices and itsState Agencies on Aging to identify additional counseling agencies forapproval by HUD Field Offices. In addition, HUD and AoA are jointly fundingtraining for existing and new housing counseling agencies about reversemortgages and their alternatives.Third, in keeping with the ABA's recommendation, HUD is developing anddistributing materials explaining the program to lenders, borrowers, andhousing counselors. In keeping with CHC's recommendation, these materialswill discuss home equity conversion mortgages available from other lenderswho are not participating in the program, as well as those who are. Finally,in keeping with a recommendation from NCOA, to reduce the potential foradverse legal action by heirs, borrowers will be urged to invite heirsto counseling sessions. Of course, the homeowner is ultimately responsiblefor deciding whether or not to take out a reverse mortgage.<ITAG tagnum="84">17. Eligible Properties</ITAG>A. Title EvidenceHUD has clarified the title evidence requirements in andSection; 206.45(a)by stating that the title insurance commitment is required with the applicationfor insurance, while the title insurance policy is submitted after closingas provided in andSection; 206.15(e).B. Types of DwellingsMBA recommended that two-to-four family dwellings be eligible as long asthe owner occupies the property and meets other program criteria. Thisrecommendation is inconsistent with section 255(d) of the statute whichstates that to be eligible for insurance, a mortgage shall ``be securedby a dwelling that is designed principally for a 1-family residence.''C. CooperativesNCOA supported the inclusion of cooperatives and condominiums as propertieseligible for an FHA reverse mortgage. Commenting on andSection; 206.45(b),FNMA recommended: ``Because of the unique relationship that exists betweena cooperative unit owner and the cooperative association, there shouldbe an agreement between the association and the cooperative owner indicatingthat the cooperative owner is participating in a reverse mortgage program.''Section 206.45 of the proposed rule included both condominium and cooperativehousing units as types of property eligible for reverse mortgage insurance.The condominium provisions have been retained, but cooperative housingunits are not included in the final rule. The proposed rule had anticipatedthe use of special procedures and requirements applicable to mortgage insurancefor cooperative housing units under section 203(n) of the Act. However,the section 203(n) program has rarely been used since it was announcedover 10 years ago, and Field Offices have little or no experience in dealingwith mortgages for cooperative housing units. The Department has now concludedthat this lack of experience coupled with the many unusual features ofreverse mortgages would probably result in significant delays in processinga reverse mortgage for a cooperative housing unit, and that the limitedamount of insurance authority available during the demonstration stagewould be better applied to other types of single-family housing more familiarto HUD Field Offices and Headquarters. D. Appraisals ABA and CHC recommended that HUD take steps to ensure that properties areproperly appraised. Appraisals will be conducted by appraisers approvedby the Secretary following established appraisal standards. E. Repair Work Section 206.47 dealing with repairs to meet minimum property standardshas been revised. It permits such repairs to be made after closing if theyare expected to cost less than 15 percent of the maximum claim amount.The lender may charge a fee of the greater of $50 or one and one-half percentof the amount spent on these repairs as compensation for these services(see andSection; 206.31). F. LeasesSection 206.45(a) will now permit insurance of a mortgage on a leaseholdproperty if the lease is for a 99 year term and is renewable. Other leaseholdproperties are eligible, but the lease term must be at least 50 years fromthe 100th birthday of the youngest borrower. Fifty years has been substitutedfor the 10 years in the proposed rule to eliminate any doubt that the leaseholdinterest will always have substantial value relative to the mortgage balance.<ITAG tagnum="84">18. Mortgage Insurance Premiums </ITAG>A. Automated Collection of MIP and Related DataSections 206.105(b), 206.111(b), and 206.115 dealing with the periodicMIP have been revised. Under section 530 of the Act, HUD is required tocollect MIP from a lender immediately after it has been collected froma borrower. The initial MIP must be paid before a loan can be endorsedfor insurance. It is earned when collected and therefore is not refundableafter endorsement. Since the monthly MIP will accrue daily on the mortgagebalance and be added to the borrower's account monthly, it will be collectedmonthly. It will be due to the Secretary on the first day of the monthfollowing its accrual. To facilitate collection, all MIP transactions between HUD and the lenderwill be automated. HUD will use a contractor to collect initial MIP, monthlyMIP, and all data needed to update its records. Each lender will be requiredto establish a banking account from which HUD will collect payments bymeans of Debit Automated Clearing House (ACH) transactions based on datatransmitted electronically by the lender to the HUD contractor. The lender will need to obtain a personal computer, printer, and modemwhich are compatible with the contractor's equipment. The HUD contractorwill provide each lender with program format screens and complete instructionsfor each of the functions to be performed. Further details are containedin HUD Handbook 4235.1FHLMC recommended that HUD simplify the collection of the periodic MIP.It is believed that use of an ACH will simplify MIP and related data collection.B. Shared Premium OptionTo eliminate confusion with another program, the Department has changedthe name of the ``coinsurance'' option to the ``shared premium'' optionat andSection; 206.107 of the final rule. Section 206.109 has been correctedto state that the lender's share of premium is based on the age of theyoungest borrower and the expected rate (without regard to the maximumclaim amount.) The amount of the lender's share of premium is determinedeach month by applying the specified number of basis points to the mortgagebalance. Preparation of the matrix of shared premiums for borrowers between theages of 62 and 95 and for all interest rates between 7.0 and 15.875 percenthas revealed that the lender share of MIP in some cases_those for youngerborrowers with high interest rates_exceeds 50 basis points, the size ofthe monthly premium. In HUD Handbook 4235.1, these premiums have been cappedat 50 basis points and starred in the table to warn lenders that thesemortgages carry added risk. Premiums below 5 basis points_those for theoldest borrowers with any interest rate, but also for older borrowers withlow interest rates_have been raised to 5 basis points (and starred) toreward lenders for choosing this option. C. Late Charges and InterestThe final rule at andSection; 206.113(c), dealing with charges for late remittanceof MIP, provides that ``any late charge owed by the lender must be paidfrom the lender's funds and may not be added to the mortgage balance ofthe borrower.''ABA recommends that lenders have a grace period before payment of a latecharge is required. Lenders will have a 10 day grace period; however, theywill be unable to add the monthly MIP to the borrower's mortgage balanceuntil it is actually paid to HUD. <ITAG tagnum="84">19. Processing </ITAG>MBA recommended that reverse mortgage processing be handled by HUD Regionalrather than Field Offices. The Department believes that, with the guidanceprovided in HUD Handbook 4235.1, Field Offices will be fully capable ofhandling reverse mortgage processing. Regarding andSection; 206.129 dealing with payment of a claim, FNMA recommendedthat HUD agree to process a claim for an assignment within 90 days. HUDcannot guarantee payment of a claim by a particular date, but it does payinterest at the debenture rate from the date of a specified action whichprecedes filing a claim (e.g., notice to the borrower that the mortgageis due and payable, or recordation of a mortgage assignment to HUD). <ITAG tagnum="84">20. Tax Treatment of Reverse Mortgage Proceeds </ITAG>GRFA recommended that HUD seek an opinion from the Internal Revenue Serviceregarding the taxability of reverse mortgage proceeds. HUD is planningformally to request a revenue ruling from IRS dealing with various aspectsof reverse mortgages. <ITAG tagnum="84">21. Evaluation of the Program</ITAG>ABA recommended that HUD should report periodically on all aspects of theprogram. By statute, HUD is required to make an interim report to Congresson the program by September 30, 1989, conduct a preliminary evaluationby March 30, 1992, and file an updated report and evaluation every twoyears thereafter. AARP recommended that counselors be involved in the data-gathering processand an accounting be provided for all waivers granted under andSection; 206.5.These recommendations will be considered when the evaluation is designed.<ITAG tagnum="84">Other Matters </ITAG>This rule does not constitute a ``major rule'' as that term is definedin section 1(b) of the Executive Order on Federal Regulations issued bythe President on February 17, 1981. Analysis of the rule indicates thatit does not (1) have an annual effect on the economy of $100 million ormore; (2) cause a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individualindustries, Federal, State or local government agencies or geographic regions;or (3) have a signficant adverse effect on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.A Finding of No Significant Impact with respect to the environment hasbeen made in accordance with HUD regulations in 24 CFR Part 50 which implementsection 102(2)(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, 42U.S.C. 4332. The Finding of No Significant Impact is available for publicinspection during regular business hours in the Office of the Rules DocketClerk at the above address. Under 5 U.S.C. 605(b) (the Regulatory Flexibility Act), the undersignedhereby certifies that this rule does not have a significant economic impacton a substantial number of small entities. Participation in the programis voluntary by both ,es and mortgagors. The General Counsel, as the Designated Official under section 6(a) of ExecutiveOrder 12612, <T3>Federalism, </T3>has determined that the policies contained in thisrule do not have federalism implications and, thus, are not subject toreview under the Order. The rule pertains only to the regulation of lendersinsured by the Federal Housing Administration. The General Counsel, as the Designated Official under Executive Order 12606,<T3>The Family, </T3>has determined that this rule does not have a potentiallysignificant impact on family formation, maintenance, and general well-being,and, thus, is not subject to review under the Order. The rule establishesinsurance for loans by private lenders to the elderly based on the equityin their home. The use of the loan proceeds is without HUD discretion.This rule was listed in the Department's Semiannual Agenda of Regulationspublished on October 24, 1988 (53 FR 41974) under Executive Order 12291and Regulatory Flexibility Act. The Home Equity Conversion, Insurance program is not listed in the Catalogof Federal Domestic Assistance. The Office of Management and Budget has approved the collection of informationrequirements of section 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980under this rule at andSection;andSection; 206.11, 206.15, 206.21 206.23, 206.27,206.41, 206.43, 206.45, 206.47, 206.105, 206.123, 206.125, 206.127, 206.131,206.133, and 206.203. The OMB clearance number is 2528-0133. The finalrule adds two new collection of information requirements at andSection;andSection;206.205 and 206.211 which have been submitted to OMB for review. Thesenew collection of information requirements are not effective until suchtime that OMB grants its approval. The approval number will be publishedin the <T4>Federal Register</T4> through a technical amendment. Information onthese requirements is provided as follows: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Tabulation of Annual Reporting Burden Approved Information Collectionsin the Final Rule Home Equity Conversion Mortgage Insurance Program </T4><H1>Description of information collection </H1><H1>Section of 24 CFR affected final rule </H1><H1>Number of respondents </H1><H1>Number of responses per respondents </H1><H1>Total annual responses </H1><H1>Hours per response </H1><H1>Total hours</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Application for reservation of insurance authority <D>206.11 </D><D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>50 </D><D>.5 </D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Purchase commitment by loan correspondent's sponsor <D>206.11(e) </D><D>5 </D><D>1 </D><D>5 </D><D>1 </D><D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Application for insurance (2502-0059, 2502-0111) <D>206.15 </D><D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>1,250 </D><D>1 </D><D>1,250</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Certification of receipt of counseling <D>206.15(c)</D><P>206.41(c) </P><D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>1,250 </D><D>.05 </D><D>62.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Adjustable rate line of credit disclosures <D>206.21(c) </D><D>50 </D><D>10 </D><D>500 </D><D>.1 </D><D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Disclosure of new adjustable interest rate <D>206.21(d) </D><D>50 </D><D>70 </D><D>3,500 </D><D>.02 </D><D>75</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Disclosure of shared appreciation mortgage terms and options <D>206.23(d) </D><D>50 </D><D>15 </D><D>750 </D><D>.5 </D><D>375</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mortgage provisions <D>206.27(b) </D><D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>1,250 </D><D>.05 </D><D>62.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notification to Secretary of potential default conditions <D>206.27(c)(2) </D><P>206.125(a)(1) </P><D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>50 </D><D>.5 </D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">List of HUD-certified counseling organizations in mortgagor's area<D>206.41(a) </D><D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>2,500 </D><D>.05 </D><D>125</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Information provided by counselors to mortgagors <D>206.41(b) </D><D>100 </D><D>50 </D><D>5,000 </D><D>1.5 </D><D>7,5000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Disclosure of mortgage terms and conditions <D>206.43(a) </D><D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>1,250 </D><D>.2 </D><D>250</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Written explanation of procedures in event of mortgagee default <D>206.43(b) </D><D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>1,250 </D><D>.05 </D><D>125</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Provision of title evidence to the Secretary <D>206.45(a) </D><D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>1,250 </D><D>.1 </D><D>125</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Certificate that no child under 7 lives in home with hazardous paintsurfaces <D>206.45(d) </D><D>50 </D><D>.1 </D><D>5 </D><D>.2 </D><D>2.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inspection of repairs by mortgagee <D>206.47(c) </D><D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>50 </D><D>.3 </D><D>15</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Amount of mortgage insurance premium <D>206.105 </D><D>50 </D><D>25 </D><D>1,250 </D><D>.01 </D><D>12.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Claim of mortgage insurance benefits (2502-0093) <D>206.123(a)</D><P>206.127 </P><D>50 </D><D>.1 </D><D>5 </D><D>1 </D><D>5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notification of mortgagor that mortgage is due and payable <D>206.125(a)(2) </D><D>50 </D><D>.001 </D><D>.05 </D><D>.5 </D><D>.025</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notice to Secretary to initiate an appraisal pursuant to a claim <D>206.125(b) </D><D>50 </D><D>.1 </D><D>5. </D><D>.2 </D><D>2.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notice to Secretary of foreclosure proceedings (2502-0347) <D>206.125(d)(3) </D><D>50 </D><D>.01 </D><D>.5 </D><D>.1 </D><D>.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request to sell property at lower price <D>206.125(g) </D><D>50 </D><D>.001 </D><D>.05 </D><D>.5 </D><D>.025</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Certification of condition of condominium upon assignment of mortgage<D>206.131(c) </D><D>50 </D><D>.01 </D><D>.5 </D><D>1 </D><D>.5</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notice pursuant to termination of insurance <D>206.133(d) </D><D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>50 </D><D>.2 </D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Statements to mortgagor of mortgage activity during the year <D>206.203 </D><D>50 </D><D>100 </D><D>5,000 </D><D>.1 </D><D>500</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notice of prepayment of line of credit mortgage <D>206.209(c) </D><D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 </D><D>.3 </D><D>3</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total annual burden <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>10,606.55</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L2,i1,s100,12,10,10,10,10,10 </C><T4>Tabulation of Annual Reporting Burden New Information Collections inFinal Rule Home Equity Conversion Mortgage Insurance Program</T4><H1>Description of information collection </H1><H1>Section of 24 CFR affected </H1><H1>Number of respondents </H1><H1>Number of responses per respondents </H1><H1>Total annual responses </H1><H1>Hours per response </H1><H1>Total hours</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Notice of change in withholding for property charges <D>206.205(e)(3) </D><D>50 </D><D>20 </D><D>100 </D><D>.25 </D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Mortgagor's annual certification of occupancy <D>206.211 </D><D>50 </D><D>50 </D><D>250 </D><D>.1 </D><D>25</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Annual Burden <D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>50</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>24 CFR Part 200Administrative practice and procedure, Claims, Equal employment opportunity,Fair housing, Housing standards, Loan programs_Housing and community development,Insurance, Organization and functions (Government agencies), Reportingand recordkeeping requirements, Minimum property standards, Incorporationby reference.24 CFR Part 206Home equity conversion mortgage insurance.Accordingly, 24 CFR Part 200 is amended and a new 24 CFR Part 206 is added,to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 200_INTRODUCTION</ITAG>1. The authority citation for 24 CFR Part 200 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Titles I and II, National Housing Act (12 U.S.C. 1701-1715z-20);sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>2. A new paragraph (d) is added to andSection;200.810 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;200.810 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Single family insurance and coinsurance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) <T3>Home equity conversion mortgage insurance.</T3> The requirements ofthis section, as modified by the following sentence, apply to a dwellingwhich is the subject of an application for mortgage insurance under section255 of the National Housing Act (home equity conversion, insurance) unlessthe mortgagor provides the certification described in andSection;206.45(d)of this chapter. The defective paint surface may be treated after the mortgageis endorsed for insurance, provided that the defective paint surface istreated as expeditiously as possible in accordance with the repair workprovisions contained in andSection;206.47 of this chapter.3. A new Part 206 is added to Chapter II of 24 CFR to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 206_HOME EQUITY CONVERSION MORTGAGE INSURANCE</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.5 Waivers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.7 Effect of amendments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Eligibility Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.9 Eligible mortgagees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.11 Application for reservations of insurance authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.13 Ineligible programs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.15 Application for insurance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Eligible Mortgages</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.17 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.19 Payment options.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.21 Interest rate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.23 Shared appreciation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.25 Calculation of payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.26 Change in payment option.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.27 Mortgage provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.31 Allowable charges and fees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Eligible Mortgagors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.33 Age of mortgagor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.35 Title held by mortgagor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.37 Credit standing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.39 Principal residence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.41 Counseling.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.43 Information to mortgagor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Eligible Properties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.45 Eligible properties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.47 Property standards; repair work.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.51 Eligibility of mortgages involving a dwelling unit in a condominium.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Contract Rights and Obligations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Sale, Assignment and Pledge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.101 Sale, assignment and pledge of insured mortgages.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Mortgage Insurance Premiums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.103 Payment of MIP.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.105 Amount of MIP.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.107 Mortgagee election of assignment or shared premium option.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.109 Amount of mortgagee share of premium.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.111 Due date of MIP.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.113 Late charge and interest.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.115 Termination.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">HUD Responsibility to Mortgagors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.117 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.119 Written statement of procedures to mortgagor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.121 Secretary authorized to make payments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Claim Procedure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.123 Claim procedures in general.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.135 Acquisition and sale of the property.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.127 Application for insurance benefits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.129 Payment of claim.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Condominiums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.131 Contract rights and obligations for mortgages on individualdwelling units in a condominium.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Termination of Insurance Contract</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.133 Termination of insurance contract.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Servicing Responsibilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.201 Mortgage servicing generally; sanctions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.203 Providing information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.205 Property charges.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.207 Allowable charges and fees after endorsement.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.209 Prepayment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">206.211 Annual determination of principal residence.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 211 and 255 of the National Housing Act (12 U.S.C.1715b, 1715z-20); sec. 7(b), Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A-General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>Section 417 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (Pub.L. 100-242) added a new section 255 to the National Housing Act (12 U.S.C.1715z-20). Section 255 authorizes a program for the insurance of home equityconversion mortgages (also known as reverse mortgages) for elderly homeowners.This program of mortgage insurance is designed:(a) To meet the special needs of elderly homeowners by reducing the effectof the economic hardship caused by the increasing costs of meeting health,housing and subsistence needs at a time of reduced income, through theinsurance of home equity conversion mortgages to permit the conversionof a portion of accumulated home equity into liquid assets;(b) To encourage and increase involvement of mortgagees and participantsin the mortgage markets in the making and servicing of home equity conversionmortgages for elderly homeowners; and (c) To evaluate data to determine the need and demand among elderly homeownersfor insured and uninsured home equity conversion mortgages, the types ofhome equity conversion mortgages that best serve the interests of elderlyhomeowner mortgagors, mortgagees and the Federal Government, and the appropriatescope and nature of participation by the Secretary in connection with homeequity conversion mortgages for the elderly.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part, the following terms shall have the meaning indicated.``Assessment'' means a special assessment by a public body or an assessmentby a condominium or homeowner association.``Contract of insurance'' means the agreement evidenced by the issuanceof a mortgage insurance certificate, incorporating by reference SubpartC and the applicable provisions of the National Housing Act.``Day'' means calendar day, except where the term ``business day'' is used.``Expected average mortgage interest rate'' means the mortgage interestrate used to calculate monthly payments to the mortgagor and establishedwhen the mortgage interest rate is established. For fixed rate mortgages,it is the fixed mortgage interest rate. For adjustable rate mortgages,it is the sum of the mortgagee's margin plus the weekly average yield forU.S. Treasury Securities adjusted to a constant maturity of 10 years. Themortgagee's margin is defined as the initial mortgage interest rate minusthe weekly average yield on U.S. Treasury Securities adjusted to a constantmaturity of one year. The mortgagee's margin is the same magin used todetermine periodic adjustments to the interest rate.``Insured mortgage'' means a mortgage which has been insured as evidencedby the issuance of a mortgage insurance certificate. ``Maximum claim amount'' means the lesser of the appraised value of theproperty or maximum dollar amount for an area established by the Secretaryfor a one-family residence under section 203(b)(2) of the National HousingAct (as adjusted where applicable under section 214 of the National HousingAct). Both the appraised value and the maximum dollar amount for the areashall be as of the date the conditional commitment is issued. Closing costsshall not be taken into account in determining appraised value.``MIP'' means the mortgage insurance premium paid by the mortgagee to theSecretary in consideration of the contract of insurance. ``Mortgage'' means a first lien on real estate under the laws of the jurisdictionwhere the real estate is located. If the dwelling unit is in a condominium,the term ``mortgage'' means a first lien covering a fee interest or eligibleleasehold interest in a one-family unit in a condominium project, togetherwith an undivided interest in the common areas and facilities serving theproject, and such restricted common areas and facilities as may be designated.The term refers both to a security instrument creating a lien, whethercalled a ``mortgage,'' ``deed of trust,'' ``security deed,'' or anotherterm used in a particular jurisdiction. The term ``mortgage'' also includesthe credit instrument, or note, secured by the lien, and the loan agreementbetween the mortgagor, the mortgagee and Secretary.``Mortgagee'' means the original lender under an insured mortgage, anyassign permitted by andSection; 206.101 and the Secretary if the mortgageis assigned to the Secretary.``Mortgagor'' means each original borrower under a mortgage. The term doesnot include successors or assigns of a borrower.``Principal limit'' means the maximum disbursement that could be receivedin any month under a mortgage, assuming that no other disbursements arereceived, taking into account the age of the youngest mortgagor, the expectedaverage mortgage interest rate, and the maximum claim amount. Mortgagorsover the age of 95 will be treated as though they are 95 for purposes ofcalculating the principal limit. The principal limit is calculated forthe first month that a mortgage could be outstanding using factors providedby the Secretary. It increases each month thereafter by one-twelfth ofthe expected average mortgage interest rate, plus the monthly MIP. It isused to calculate payments to a mortgagor.``Principal residence'' means the dwelling where the mortgagor maintainshis or her permanent place of abode, and typically spends the majorityof the calendar year. A person may have only one principal residence atany one time.``Secretary'' means the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development or hisor her authorized representatives.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waivers.</ITAG>The Secretary, in an individual case, may waive any requirement of SubpartB not required by statue if the Secretary finds that application of suchrequirement would adversely affect achievement of the purposes of thisprogram. Each such waiver shall be in writing and supported by a statementof the facts and grounds forming the basis for the waiver. The authorityunder this section may be delegated to the Assistant Secretary for Housing-FederalHousing Commissioner, but shall not be delegated further.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Effect of amendments</ITAG>The regulations in this part may be amended by the Secretary at any timeand from time to time, in whole or in part, but amendments to SubpartsB and C shall not adversely affect the interests of a mortgagee under thecontract of insurance on any mortgage already insured, and shall not adverselyaffect the interests of a mortgagee on any mortgage to be insured on whichthe Secretary has made a commitment to insure. Such amendments shall notadversely affect the interests of a mortgagor in the case of a defaultby a mortgagee where the Secretary makes payments to the mortgagor.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Eligibility Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible mortgagees.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Statutory requirements. </T3>A mortgagee must be authorized to madereverse mortgages under a Federal law other than andSection; 255 of the NationalHousing Act, including section 804 of the Garn-St Germain Depository InstitutionsAct of 1982, or the law of the State where the property to be mortgagedis located.(b) <T3>HUD approved mortgagees. </T3>Any mortgagee authorized under paragraph(a) of this section and approved under Part 203 of this chapter, exceptan investing mortgagee approved under andSection;203.6 of this chapter, iseligible to apply for reservations of insurance authority in accordancewith andSection;206.11 of this chapter. A mortgagee approved under andSection;andSection;203.3,203.4, 203.6 or 203.7 of this chapter may purchase, hold and sell mortgagesinsured under this part without additional approval.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application for reservations of insurance authority.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Definition. </T3>A reservation of insurance authority is an assuranceby the Secretary that the Secretary will be able to insure a mortgage whichmeets the requirements of this subpart.(b) <T3>Application. </T3>An eligible mortgagee may apply for reservationsof insurance authority in accordance with instructions issued by the Secretary.An eligible mortgagee may apply for additional reservations after its initialreservations are used or expire if reservations of insurance authorityare available.(c) <T3>Approval. </T3>If the application for the reservations is acceptable,the Secretary will then approve the request for reservations if reservationsof insurance authority are available. A mortgagee may not originate a mortgageunder this part without first obtaining a reservation of insurance authorityfor the mortgage.(d) <T3>Expiration and extension. </T3>A reservation of insurance authoritywill expire six months after the date of issue. Reservations will be extendedif a conditional commitment is secured from the Secretary before the reservationexpires. Reservations of insurance authority will be extended until thefirm commitment for that application expires.(e) <T3>Requirements for approval_loan correspondents. </T3>At the time ofapplication for reservations of insurance authority, a loan correspondent(as defined in andSection;203.5 of this chapter) shall provide evidence satisfactoryto the Secretary that the mortgages to be insured under this part willbe purchased by the loan correspondent's sponsor or sponsors. Such evidenceshall include: (1) The name of each sponsor mortgagee which will purchasethe mortgages originated under this part, and (2) a copy of each purchaseagreement which obligates the sponsor mortgagee to purchase the mortgagesoriginated under this part. The collective agreements must show that allthe mortgages originated by the loan correspondent will be purchased ifall insurance authority reserved by the loan correspondent under paragraph(c) of this section is used.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ineligible programs.</ITAG>Mortgages originated through the Direct Endorsement or Coinsurance programsare not eligible for insurance under this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application for insurance.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Submission. </T3>A mortgagee with a reservation of insurance authoritymay submit an application for insurance of a mortgage which is about tobe executed.(b) <T3>Form. </T3>The application must be made upon a form prescribed by theSecretary.(c) <T3>Insurance of mortgage. </T3>The Secretary approves an application formortgage insurance by issuing a conditional commitment and a firm commitment.The Secretary shall establish in the commitment documents the terms andconditions upon which the mortgage will be insured. The mortgagee, uponclosing the mortgage, submits to the Secretary the commitment documents,the certificate received by the mortgagor from the counseling entity thatthe mortgagor has received counseling as required under andSection;206.41,a title insurance policy, the mortgagee's election of either the assignmentor shared premium option under andSection;206.107, a copy of the mortgageto be insured, the original second mortgage required by andSection;206.27(e),and any other documentation required by the Secretary. If the mortgageehas complied with the terms and conditions of the commitment documentsand this paragraph (c), the Secretary will issue a Mortgage Insurance Certificate.Mortgages insured under this part shall be obligations of the General InsuranceFund.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Eligible Mortgages</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.17 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Payment options. </T3>A mortgage shall initially provide for the tenurepayment option (andSection;206.19(a)), the term payment option (andSection;206.19(b)),or the line of credit payment option (andSection;206.19(c)), subject to laterchange in accordance with andSection;206.26.(b) <T3>Interest rate. </T3>A mortgage shall provide for either fixed or adjustableinterest rates in accordance with andSection;206.21.(c) <T3>Shared appreciation. </T3>A mortgage may provide for shared appreciationin accordance with andSection;206.23.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.19 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment options.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Term payment option. </T3>Under the term payment option, equal monthlypayments are made by the mortgagee to the mortgagor for a fixed term ofmonths chosen by the mortgagor, unless the mortgage is prepaid in fullor becomes due and payable earlier under andSection;206.27(c).(b) <T3>Tenure payment option. </T3>Under the tenure payment option, equalmonthly payments are made by the mortgagee to the mortgagor as long asthe property is the principal residence of the mortgagor, unless the mortgageis prepaid in full or becomes due and payable under andSection;206.27(c).(c) <T3>Line of credit payment option. </T3>Under the line of credit option,payments are made by the mortgagee to the mortgagor at times and in amountsdetermined by the mortgagor, if the mortgage balance after the paymentwill be less than or equal to the principal limit for the month in whichthe payment is drawn, excluding any portion of the principal limit setaside for repairs or servicing charges.(d) <T3>Principal limit set asides.</T3> (1) Under the term or tenure options,the mortgagee shall, if requested by the mortgagor, set aside a portionof the principal limit to be drawn down as a line of credit.  (2) When repairs required by andSection;206.47 will be completed after closing,the mortgagee shall set aside a portion of the principal limit equal to150% of the Secretary's estimated cost of repairs, plus the repair administrationfee.  (3) When required by andSection;206.205(f), the mortgagee shall set asidea portion of the principal limit for payment of property charges consistingof taxes, ground rents, flood and hazard insurance premiums and assessments. (4) When servicing charges will be made as permitted by andSection;206.207(b),the mortgagee shall set aside a portion of the principal limit sufficientto cover charges through a period equal to the payment term which wouldbe used to calculate tenure payments under andSection;206.25(c).  (e) <T3>Interest accrual and repayment.</T3> The interest charged on the mortgagebalance shall be added to the mortgage balance monthly as provided in themortgage. Under all payment options, repayment of the mortgage balanceincluding monthly MIP and interest is deferred until the mortgage becomesdue and payable in full under andSection;206.27(c).  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.21  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interest rate.    </ITAG>(a) <T3>Fixed interest rate.</T3> A fixed interest rate is agreed upon by themortgagor and mortgagee.   (b) <T3>Adjustable interest rate.</T3> An initial interest rate is agreed uponby the mortgagor and mortgagee. The interest rate shall be adjusted inone of two ways depending on the option selected by the mortgagor. Wheneveran interest rate is adjusted, the new interest rate applies to the entiremortgage balance. The difference between the initial interest rate andthe index figure applicable when the firm commitment is issued shall equalthe margin used to determine interest rate adjustments.  (1) A mortgagee offering an adjustable interest rate shall offer a mortgagethat limits the frequency and magnitude of rate increases and decreasesas provided in andSection;206.49(a), (c) and (e) of this chapter, exceptthat reference to ``mortgagor's first debt service payment'' in andSection;203.49(c)shall mean ``closing,'' and references in andSection;203.43(e)(1) to ``onepercentage point'' shall mean ``two percentage points.''  (2) If a mortgage meeting the requirements of paragraph (b)(1) of thissection is offered, the mortgagee may also offer a mortgage which providesfor monthly adjustments to the interest rate, corresponding to an indexas provided in andSection;203.49(a) and (e)(2), and which sets a maximuminterest rate that can be charged without limiting monthly or annual increasesor decreases. The first adjustment must occur on the first day of the secondfull month after closing.  (c) <T3>Pre-loan Disclosure.</T3> (1) At the time the mortgagee provides themortgagor with a loan application, a mortgagee also shall provide a mortgagorwith a written explanation of any adjustable interest rate features ofa mortgage. The explanation must include the following items:  (i) The circumstances under which the rate may increase;  (ii) Any limitations on the increase; and  (iii) The effect of an increase.  (2) After 12 CFR Part 226 (Truth in Lending) has been amended to implementthe pre-loan disclosure provisions of the Home Equity Loan Consumer ProtectionAct of 1988, compliance with 12 CFR Part 226 shall constitute full compliancewith paragraph (c)(1) of this section.    (d) <T3>Post-loan disclosure.</T3> At least 25 days before any adjustment tothe interest rate may occur, the mortgagee must advise the mortgagor ofthe following:  (1) The current index amount; and  (2) The new mortgage interest rate.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)    </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.23 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Shared appreciation.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Additional interest based on net appreciated value.</T3> Any mortgagefor which the mortgagee has chosen the shared premium option (andSection;206.107)may provide for shared appreciation. At the time the mortgage becomes dueand payable or is paid in full, whichever occurs first, the mortgagor shallpay an additional amount of interest equal to a percentage of any net appreciatedvalue of the property during the life of the mortgage. The percentage ofnet appreciated value to be paid to the mortgagee, referred to as the appreciationmargin, shall be no more than twenty-five percent, subject to an effectiveinterest rate cap of no more than twenty percent.(b) <T3>Computation of mortgagee share. </T3>The mortgagee's share of net appreciatedvalue is computed as follows:(1) If the mortgage balance at the time the mortgagee's share of net appreciatedvalue becomes payable is less than the appraised value of the propertyat the time of loan origination, the mortgagee's share is calculated bysubtracting the appraised value at the time of loan origination from theadjusted sales proceeds (i.e., sales proceeds less transfer costs and capitalimprovement costs incurred by the mortgagor, but excluding any liens) andmultiplying by the appreciation margin.(2) If the mortgage balance is greater than the appraised value at thetime of loan origination but less than the adjusted proceeds, the mortgagee'sshare is calculated by subtracting the mortgage balance from the adjustedsales proceeds and multiplying by the appreciation margin.(3) If the mortgage balance is greater than the adjusted sales proceeds,the net appreciated value is zero.(4) If there has been no sale or transfer involving satisfaction of themortgage at the time the mortgagee's share of net appreciated value becomespayable, ``sales proceeds'' for purposes of this section shall be the appraisedvalue as determined in accordance with procedures approved by the Secretary.(c) <T3>Effective interest rate.</T3> To determine the effective interest rate,the amount of interest which accrued in the twelve months prior to thesale of the property is added to the mortgagee's share of the net appreciatedvalue. The sum of the mortgagee's share of the net appreciated value andthe interest, when divided by the sum of the mortgage balance at the beginningof the twelve month period prior to sale plus the payments to or on behalfof the mortgagor (but not including interest) in the twelve months priorto the sale, shall not exceed an effective interest rate of twenty percent.(d) <T3>Disclosure.</T3> At the time the mortgagee provides the mortgagor witha loan application for a mortgage with shared appreciation, the mortgageeshall disclose to the mortgagor the principal limit, payments and interestrate which are applicable to a comparable mortgage offered by the mortgagewithout shared appreciation.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Calculation of payments.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Initial payment.</T3> At closing an initial payment shall be made bythe mortgagee in an amount equal to the sum of initial MIP under andSection;206.105(a)if not paid in cash by the mortgagor, fees and charges allowed under andSection;206.31(a)if not paid in cash by the mortgagor, and any additional payment requestedby the mortgagor. The total initial payment, plus any amount set asidefor repairs after closing under andSection;206.47, for property charges underandSection;206.205(f), or for servicing charges under andSection;206.207(b),shall not exceed the principal limit.(b) <T3>Monthly payments_term option.</T3> (1) Using factors provided by theSecretary, the mortgagee shall calculate the monthly payment so that thesum of (i) or (ii) added to (iii), (iv), (v) and (vi) shall be equal tothe principal limit at the end of the payment term:(i) An initial payment under paragraph (a) of this section plus any portionof the principal limit set aside for repairs, or property charges or servicingcharges under andSection;206.19(d), or (ii) The mortgage balance at the time of a change in payment pattern inaccordance with andSection;206.26 plus any portion of the principal limitset aside for repairs or property charges under andSection;206.19(d) whichremains unused; and(iii) Any amount of the principal limit set aside as a line of credit;and(iv) All monthly payments (including any amounts to be withheld for propertycharges) due through the payment term; and(v) All MIP due through the payment term; and(vi) All interest through the payment term. The expected average mortgageinterest rate shall be used for this purpose.(2) If the mortgage has an adjustable interest rate, the mortgagee shallmake all monthly payments through the payment term even if the mortgagebalance exceeds the principal limit because the actual average mortgageinterest rate exceeds the expected average mortgage interest rate.(c) <T3>Monthly payments_tenure option.</T3> Monthly payments under the tenurepayment option shall be calculated as if the number of months in the paymentterm equals 100 minus the age of the youngest mortgagor multiplied by 12,but payments shall continue until the mortgage becomes due and payableunder andSection;206.27(c).(d) <T3>Combining options.</T3> If the mortgagor combines a line of creditset aside with the term or tenure payment option, the principal limit isdivided into one amount for the term or tenure payments and another amountfor the line of credit payments. Each part of the principal limit increasesindependently at the same rate as the total principal limit increases underandSection;206.3. A payment under the line of credit may not exceed the differencebetween the current value of the principal limit set aside and the portionof the mortgage balance, including accrued interest and MIP, attributableto draws on the line of credit.(e) <T3>Payment of MIP and interest.</T3> At the end of each month, interestaccrued during the month shall be added to the mortgage balance. MonthlyMIP shall be added to the mortgage balance when paid to the Secretary.(f) <T3>Mortgagee late charge.</T3> The mortgagee shall pay a late charge tothe mortgagor for any late payment. If the mortgagee does not mail or electronicallytransfer a scheduled monthly payment to the mortgagor on the first businessday of the month or make a line of credit payment within 5 business daysof the date the mortgagee received the request, the late charge shall be10 percent of the entire amount that should have been paid to the mortgagorfor that month or as a result of that request. For each additional daythat the mortgagor does not receive payment, the mortgagee shall pay interestat the mortgage interest rate on the late payment. In no event shall thetotal late charge exceed five hundred dollars. Any late charge shall bepaid from the mortgagee's funds and shall not be added to the mortgagebalance.(g) <T3>No minimum payments.</T3> A mortgagee shall not require, as a conditionof providing a loan secured by a mortgage insured under this part, thatthe monthly payments under the term or tenure payment option or draws underthe line of credit payment option exceed a minimum amount established bythe mortgagee.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.26</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Change in payment option.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> The initial payment option may be changed as providedin this section.(b) <T3>Change due to initial repairs.</T3> (1) If initial repairs after closingunder andSection;206.47 are completed without using all of the funds setaside for repairs, monthly payments shall be recalculated in accordancewith andSection;206.25 when repairs are completed.(2) If repairs after closing under andSection;206.47 cannot be completedwith the funds set aside for repairs, the mortgagor may draw additionalfunds needed to complete repairs, within the principal limit, and monthlypayments shall be recalculated in accordance with andSection;206.25 whenrepairs are completed.(3) If repairs are not completed when required by the mortgage, the mortgageeshall stop monthly payments and the mortgage shall convert to the lineof credit payment option. Until the repairs are completed, the mortgageeshall make no line of credit payments except as needed to pay for repairsrequired by the mortgage.(c) <T3>Other changes.</T3> As long as the mortgage balance is less than theprincipal limit, a mortgagor may request a change from any payment optionto another or a payment of any amount (not to exceed the difference betweenthe principal limit and the sum of the mortgage balance and any set asidesfor repairs or servicing charges. A mortgage will continue to bear interestat a fixed or adjustable interest rate as agreed between the mortgageeand the mortgagor at loan origination. The mortgagee shall recalculateany future monthly payments in accordance with andSection;206.25.(d) <T3>Fee for change in payments.</T3> The mortgagee may charge a fee, notto exceed twenty dollars, whenever payments are recalculated.(e) <T3>Limitations.</T3> The Secretary may prescribe a limitation on the frequencyof payment changes, a minimum notice period that a mortgagor must providewith a request under paragraph (c) of this section, or other limitationson changes by the mortgagor.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mortgage provisions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Form.</T3> The mortgage shall be in a form meeting the requirementsof the Secretary.(b) <T3>Provisions.</T3> The mortgage shall explain how payments will be madeto the mortgagor, how interest will be charged and when the mortgage willbe due and payable. It shall also contain provisions designed to ensurecompliance with this part and provisions on the following additional matters:(1) Payments by the mortgagee under the term or tenure payment optionsshall be mailed to the mortgagor or electronically transferred to an accountof the mortgagor on the first business day of each month beginning withthe first month after closing. Payments under the line of credit paymentoption shall be mailed to the mortgagor or electronically transferred toan account of the mortgagor within five business days after the mortgageehas received a written request for payment by the mortgagor.(2) The mortgagor shall maintain hazard insurance on the property in anamount acceptable to the Secretary and the mortgagee.(3) The mortgagor shall not participate in a real estate tax deferral program,if any liens created by the tax deferral are not subordinate to the insuredmortgage and the second mortgage held by the Secretary.(4) A mortgage may be prepaid in full or in part in accordance with andSection;206.209.(5) The mortgagor must keep the property in good repair.(6) The mortgagor must pay taxes, hazard insurance premiums, ground rentsand assessments in a timely manner, except to the extent such propertycharges are paid by the mortgagee in accordance with andSection;206.205.(7) The mortgagor shall be charged for the payment of monthly MIP.(8) The mortgagor shall have no personal liability for payment of the mortgagebalance. The mortgagee shall enforce the debt only through sale of theproperty. The mortgagee shall not be permitted to obtain a deficiency judgmentagainst the mortgagor if the property is foreclosed.(9) If the mortgage is assigned to the Secretary under andSection;206.121(b),the mortgagor shall not be liable for any difference between the insurancebenefits paid to the mortgagee and the mortgage balance including accruedinterest, owed by the mortgagor at the time of the assignment.(10) If State law limits the first lien status of the mortgage as originallyexecuted and recorded to a maximum amount of debt or a maximum number ofyears, the mortgagor shall agree to execute any additional documents requiredby the mortgagee and approved by the Secretary to extend the first lienstatus to an additional amount of debt and an additional number of yearsand to cause any other liens to be removed or subordinated.(c) <T3>Date the mortgage comes due and payable.</T3> (1) The mortgage shallstate that the mortgage balance will be due and payable in full if (i)a mortgagor dies and the property is not the principal residence of atleast one surviving mortgagor, or (ii) a mortgagor conveys all of his orher title in the property and no other mortgagor retains title to the propertyin fee simple or on a leasehold interest as set forth in andSection;206.45(a).(2) The mortgage shall state that the mortgage balance shall be due andpayable in full, upon approval of the Secretary, if any of the followingoccur:(i) The property ceases to be the principal residence of a mortgagor forreasons other than death and the property is not the principal residenceof at least one other mortgagor;(ii) For a period of longer than 12 consecutive months, a mortgagor failsto occupy the property because of physical or mental illness and the propertyis not the principal residence of at least one other mortgagor; or  (iii) An obligation of the mortgagor under the mortgage is not performed.(d) <T3>Second mortgage to Secretary</T3>. A second mortage to secure any paymentsby the Secretary as provided in andSection; 206.121(c) must be given to theSecretary before a mortgage insurance certificate is issued for the firstmortgage. The second mortgage shall be junior only to the insured mortgageand in a form meeting the requirements of the Secretary which shall besimilar to requirements for the insured mortgage. The mortgagee shall payall expenses of preparing and recording the second mortgage.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.31 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allowable charges and fees.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Fees at closing</T3>. The mortgagee may collect, either in cash atthe time of closing or through an initial payment under the mortgage, thefollowing charges and fees incurred in connection with the originationof the mortgage loan:(1) A charge to compensate the mortgagee for expenses incurred in originatingand closing the mortgage loan: <T3>Provided</T3>, That the Secretary may establish limitations on theamount of any such charge which can be included in the mortgage loan.(2) Reasonable and customary amounts, but not more than the amount actuallypaid by the mortgagee, for any of the following items:(i) Recording fees and recording taxes, or other charges incident to therecordation of the insured mortgage;(ii) Credit report;(iii) Survey, if required by the mortgagee or the mortgagor;(iv) Title examination;(v) Mortgagee's title insurance;(vi) Fees paid to an appraiser for the initial appraisal of the property;and(vii) Such other charges as may be authorized by the Secretary.(b) <T3>Repair administration fee</T3>. If the property requires repairs afterclosing in order to meet HUD requirements, the mortgagee may collect afee as compensation for administrative duties relating to repair work pursuantto andSection; 206.47(c), not to exceed the greater of one and one-half percentof the amount advanced for the repairs or fifty dollars. The mortgageeshall collect the repair fee by adding it to the mortgage balance.<ITAG tagnum="84">Eligible Mortgagors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.33 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Age of mortgagor.</ITAG>The youngest mortgagor shall be 62 years of age or older at the time themortgagee submits the application for insurance under andSection; 206.15.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.35 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Title held by mortgagor.</ITAG>The mortgagor shall hold title to the entire property which is the securityfor the mortgage. If there are multiple mortgagors, all the mortgagorsmust collectively hold title to the entire property which is the securityfor the mortgage.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.37 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Credit standing.</ITAG>Each mortgagor must have a general credit standing satisfactory to theSecretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.39 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Principal residence.</ITAG>The property must be the principal residence of each mortgagor at closing.For purposes of this section, the property will be considered to be theprincipal residence of any mortgagor who is temporarily or permanentlyin a health care institution as long as the property is the principal residenceof at least one other mortgagor who is not in a health care institution.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.41 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Counseling.</ITAG>(a) <T3>List provided</T3>. At the time of the initial contact with the prospectivemortgagor, the mortgagee shall give the mortgagor a list of the names andaddresses of housing counseling agencies which have been approved by theSecretary as responsible and able to provide the information describedin paragraph (b) of this section. The mortgagor must receive counseling.(b) <T3>Information to be provided</T3>. A counselor shall discuss the followinginformation with the mortgagor:(1) Options other than a home equity conversion mortgage, including a mortgageinsured under this part, that are available to the mortgagor, includingother housing, social service, health, and financial options;(2) Other home equity conversion options that are or may become availableto the mortgagor, such as sale-leaseback financing, deferred payment loans,and property tax deferral;(3) The financial implications of entering into a home equity conversionmortgage, including a mortgage insured under this part;(4) A disclosure that a home equity conversion mortgage, including a mortgageinsured under this part, may have tax consequences, affect eligibilityfor assistance under Federal and State programs, and have an impact onthe estate and heirs of the homeowner; and(5) Any other information the Secretary may require.(c) <T3>Certificate</T3>. The counselor will provide the mortgagor with a certificatestating that the mortgagor has received counseling. The mortgagor shallprovide the mortgagee with a copy of the certificate.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.43 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information to mortgagor.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Explanation of mortgage terms</T3>. At the time the mortgagee providesthe mortgagor with a loan application, the mortgagee shall provide eachmortgagor with a copy of the mortgage forms. At that time the mortgageeshall identify and explain to the mortgagor the principal provisions ofthe mortgage.(b) <T3>Statement of payment procedures</T3>. At the time the mortgagee providesthe mortgagor with a loan application, the mortgagee shall give to eachmortgagor an unsigned, written statement prepared by the Secretary of theprocedures to be followed to ensure that timely payments are made by themortgagee. After the mortgage insurance certificate is issued, the Secretarywill provide a signed copy of this statement of procedures to the mortgagor,pursuant to andSection; 206.119.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Eligible Properties</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.45 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible properties.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Title</T3>. A mortgage must be on real estate held in fee simple, oron a leasehold (1) under a lease for not less than ninety-nine years whichis renewable, or (2) under a lease having a remaining period of not lessthan 50 years beyond the date of the 100th birthday of the youngest mortgagor.The mortgagee shall submit to the Secretary with the application for insurancea commitment for mortgagee's title insurance satisfactory to the Secretary.If the Secretary determines that title insurance for reverse mortgagesis not available for reasonable rates in a State, then the Secretary mayspecify other acceptable forms of title evidence in lieu of title insurance.(b) <T3>Type of property</T3>. The property shall include a dwelling designedprincipally as a one-family residence. The dwelling may be connected withother dwellings by a party wall or otherwise. A condominium unit designedfor one-family occupancy shall also be an eligible property.(c) <T3>Flood insurance and property location</T3>. The provisions of andSection;203.16a of this chapter pertaining to flood insurance and andSection; 203.40of this chapter pertaining to the location of the property are incorporatedby reference.(d) <T3>Lead-based paint poisoning prevention</T3>. If the appraiser of a dwellingconstructed prior to 1978 finds defective paint surfaces, andSection; 200.810(d)of this chapter shall apply unless the mortgagor certifies that no childwho is less than seven years of age resides or is expected to reside inthe dwelling.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.47 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Property standards; repair work.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Need for repairs</T3>. Properties must meet the Minimum Property Standardsof the Secretary in order to be eligible. Properties which do not meetthe property standards must be repaired in order to ensure that the repairedproperty will serve as adequate security for the insured mortgage.(b) <T3>Assurance that repairs are made</T3>. The mortgage may be closed beforethe repair work is completed if the Secretary estimates that the cost ofthe remaining repair work will not exceed 15 percent of the maximum claimamount and the mortgage contains provisions approved by the Secretary concerningpayment for the repairs.(c) <T3>Role of mortgagee</T3>. The mortgagee shall cause one or more inspectionsof the property to be made by an inspector approved by the Secretary inorder to ensure that the repair work is satisfactory, and prior to therelease of funds for the repairs. The mortgagee shall hold back a portionof the contract price attributable to the work done before each interimrelease of funds, and the total of the hold backs will be released afterthe final inspection and approval of the release by the mortgagee. Themortgagee shall ensure that all mechanics' and materialmen's liens arereleased of record. A fee as established in andSection; 206.31(b) may becharged by the mortgagee as compensation for administration of the repairprovisions of the mortgage.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.51 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligibility of mortgages involving a dwelling unit in a condominium.</ITAG>If the mortgage involves a dwelling unit in a condominium, the projectin which the unit is located shall have been committed to a plan of condominiumownership by deed, or other recorded instrument, that is acceptable tothe Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Contract Rights and Obligations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Sale, Assignment and Pledge</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sale, assignment and pledge of insured mortgages.</ITAG>The provisions of andSection;andSection; 203.430 through 203.435 of this chaptershall be applicable to mortgages eligible for insurance under this part.<ITAG tagnum="84">Mortgage Insurance Premiums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.103 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment of MIP.</ITAG>The payment of any MIP under this subpart shall be made to the Secretaryby the mortgagee in cash, until the contract of insurance is terminated.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 206.105 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amount of MIP.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Initial MIP</T3>. The mortgagee shall pay to the Secretary an initialMIP of two percent of the maximum claim amount.(b) <T3>Monthly MIP</T3>. Monthly MIP will accrue daily on the mortgage balanceat a rate equivalent to one-half of one percent per annum and shall beadded to the mortgage balance when paid to the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.107 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mortgagee election of assignment or shared premium option. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Election of option. </T3>Before the mortgage is submitted for insuranceendorsement, the mortgagee shall elect either the assignment option orthe shared premium option. (1) Under the assignment option, the mortgagee shall have the option ofassigning the mortgage to the Secretary at the time that the mortgage balance,including accrued interest and MIP, equals the maximum claim amount, if:(i) The mortgagee is current in making the required payments under themortgage to the mortgagor; (ii) The mortgagee is current in its payment of the MIP (and late chargesand interest on the MIP, if any) to the Secretary; (iii) The mortgage is not due and payable under andSection;206.27(c)(1);and (iv) The mortgagee has not informed the Secretary of an event describedin andSection;206.27(c)(2), or the Secretary has been so informed but hasdenied approval for the mortgage to be due and payable. At the mortgagee'soption, the mortgagee may forgo assignment of the mortgage and file a claimunder any of the circumstances described in andSection;206.123(a)(2)-(5).(2) Under the shared premium option, the mortgagee may not assign a mortgageto the Secretary unless the mortgagee fails to make payments and the Secretarydemands assignment (andSection;206.123(a)(2)), but the mortgagee shall onlybe required to remit a reduced monthly MIP to the Secretary. The mortgageeshall collect from the mortgagor the full amount of the monthly MIP providedin andSection;206.105(b) but shall retain a portion of the monthly MIP paidby the mortgagor as compensation for the default risk assumed by the mortgagee.The portion of the MIP to be retained by a mortgagee shall be determinedby the Secretary as calculated in andSection;206.109. For a particular mortgage,the applicable portion shall be determined as of the date of the commitment.The mortgagee retains the right to file a claim under any of the circumstancesdescribed in andSection;206.123(a)(2)-(5). (b) <T3>No election for shared appreciation. </T3>Shared appreciation mortgagesshall be insured by the Secretary only under the shared premium option.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.109 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amount of mortgagee share of premium. </ITAG>Using the factors provided by the Secretary, the amount of the mortgageeshare of the premium shall be determined for each mortgage based upon theage of the youngest mortgagor and the expected average mortgage interestrate. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.111 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Due date of MIP. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Initial MIP. </T3>The mortgagee shall pay the initial MIP to the Secretarywithin fifteen days of closing and as a condition to the endorsement ofthe mortgage for insurance. (b) <T3>Monthly MIP. </T3>Each monthly MIP shall be due to the Secretary onthe first business day of each month except the month in which the mortgageis closed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.113 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Late charge and interest. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Late charge. </T3>Initial MIP remitted to the Secretary after the paymentdate in andSection;206.111(a) and monthly MIP remitted to the Secretary 10days after the payment date in andSection;206.111(b) shall include a latecharge of one percent of the amount paid. (b) <T3>Interest. </T3>In additon to any late charge provided in paragraph(a) of this section, the mortgagee shall pay interest on any initial MIPremitted to the Secretary more than 30 days after closing, and intereston any monthly MIP remitted to the Secretary more than 30 days after thepayment date prescribed in andSection;206.111(b). Such interest rate shallbe paid at a rate set in conformity with the Treasury Fiscal RequirementsManual. (c) <T3>Paid by mortgagee. </T3>Any late charge owed by the mortgagee shallbe paid from the mortgagee's funds and shall not be added to the mortgagebalance of the mortgagor. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.115 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination. </ITAG>When the insurance contract is terminated, the mortgagee shall pay themonthly MIP which has accrued for the current month and which has not yetbeen paid to the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="84">HUD Responsibility to Mortgagors </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.117 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>The Secretary is required by statute to take any action necessary to providea mortgagor with funds to which the mortgagor is entitled under the mortgageand which the mortgagor does not receive because of the default of themortgagee. The Secretary will hold a second mortgage to secure repaymentby the mortgagor, see andSection;206.27(d). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.119 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Written statement of procedures to mortgagor. </ITAG>When the mortgage is insured, the Secretatry shall provide the mortgagorwith a signed statement of procedures to ensure that all of the funds dueunder the mortgage will be received by the mortgagor, or paid to a thirdparty on behalf of the mortgagor. The statement shall specify (a) the HUDoffice to contact in case of a late payment, and (b) the procedures whichthe mortgagor must follow to make a request for payment by the Secretary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.121 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Secretary authorized to make payments. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Investigation. </T3>The secretary will investigate all complaints bya mortgagor concerning late payments. If the Secretary determines thatthe mortgagee is unable or unwilling to make all payments required underthe mortgage, including late charges, the Secretary shall pay such paymentsand late charges to the mortgagor. (b) <T3>Reimbursement or assignment. </T3>The Secretary may demand, that within30 days from the demand, the mortgagee reimburse the Secretary, with interestfrom the date of payment by the Secretary, or assign the insured mortgageto the Secretary. Interest shall be paid at a rate set in conformity withthe Treasury Fiscal Requirements Manual. If the mortgagee complies withthe reimbursement demand, then the contract of insurance shall not be affected.If the morrgagee complies by assigning the mortgage for record within 30days of the demand, then the Secretary shall pay an insurance claim asprovided in andSection;206.129(e)(3) and assume all responsibilities of themortgagee under the first mortgage. If the mortgagee fails to comply withthe demand within 30 days, the contract of insurance will terminate asprovided in andSection;206.133(c). (c) <T3>Second mortgage. </T3>If the contract of insurance is terminated asprovided in andSection;206.133(c), all payments to the mortgagor by the Secretarywill be secured by the second mortgage required by andSection;206.27(e).Payments will be due and payable in the same manner as under the insuredfirst mortgage. The liability of the mortgagor under the first mortgageshall be limited to payments actually made by the mortgagee to or on behalfof the mortgagor (including MIP), and shall exclude accrued interest, whetheror not it has been included in the mortgage balance, and shared appreciation,if any. Interest will stop accruing on the first mortgage when the Secretarybegins to make payments under the second mortgage. The first mortgage willnot be due and payable until the second mortgage is due and payable.  <ITAG tagnum="84">Claim Procedure </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.123 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Claim procedures in general. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Claims. </T3>Mortgagees may submit claims for the payment of the mortgageinsurance benefits if: (1) The conditions of andSection;206.107(a)(1) pertaining to the optionalassignment of the mortgage by the mortgagee have been met and the mortgageeassigns the mortgage to the Secretary; (2) The mortgagee is unable or unwilling to make the payments under themortgage and assigns the mortgage to the Secretary pursuant to the Secretary'sdemand, as provided in andSection;206.121(b); (3) The mortgagor sells the property for less than the mortgage balanceand the mortgagee releases the mortgage of record to facilitate the sale,as provided in andSection;206.125(c); (4) The mortgagee acquires title to the property by foreclosure or a deedin lieu of foreclosure and sells the property as provided in andSection;206.125(g),for an amount which does not satisfy the mortgage balance; or (5) The mortgagee forecloses and a bidder other than the mortgagee purchasesthe property for an amount that is not sufficient to satisfy the mortgagebalance, as provided in andSection;206.125(e). (b) <T3>Expanded definition of mortgagor. </T3>The term ``mortgagor'' as usedin this subpart shall have the same meaning as stated in andSection;206.3,except that in reference to a sale by the mortgagor, the term shall alsomean the mortgagor's estate or personal representative.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.125 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Acquisition and sale of the property. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Initial action by the mortgagee. </T3>(1) The mortgagee shall notifythe Secretary whenever the mortgage is due and payable under the conditionsstated in andSection;206.27(c)(1), or one of the conditions stated in andSection;206.27(c)(2)has occurred. (2) After notifying the Secretary, and receiving approval of the Secretarywhen needed, the mortgagee shall notify the mortgagor that the mortgageis due and payable. The mortgage shall require the mortgagor to (i) paythe mortgage balance, including any accrued interest and MIP, in full;(ii) sell the property for at least 95% of the appraised value as determinedunder andSection;206.125(b), with the net proceeds of the sale to be appliedtowards the mortgage balance; or (iii) provide the mortgagee with a deedin lieu of foreclosure. The mortgagor shall have 30 days in which to complywith the preceding sentence, or correct the matter which resulted in themortgage coming due and payable, before a foreclosure proceeding is begun.(3) Even after a foreclosure proceeding is begun, the mortgagee shall permitthe mortgagor to correct the condition which resulted in the mortgage comingdue and payable and to reinstate the mortgage, and the mortgage insuranceshall continue in effect. The mortgagee may require the mortgagor to payany costs that the mortgagee incurred to reinstate the mortgagor, includingforclosure costs and reasonable attorney's fees. Such costs shall be paidby adding them to the mortgage balance. The mortgagee may refuse reinstatementby the mortgagor if: (i) The mortgagee has accepted reinstatement of the mortgage within thepast two years immediately preceeding the current notification to the mortgagorthat the mortgage is due and payable; (ii) Reinstatement will preclude foreclosure if the mortgage becomes dueand payable at a later date; or (iii) Reinstatement will adversely affect the priority of the mortgagelien. (b) <T3>Appraisal. </T3>The property may be appraised upon the mortgagor'srequest at the time the mortgagor is sent the notice that the mortgageis due and payable, or in connection with a pending sale. The propertyshall be appraised no later than 15 days before a foreclosure sale. Wheneveran appraisal is requested or required, the mortgagee shall notify the Secretaryto cause an appraisal of the property to be made. The Secretary shall informthe mortgagee and the mortgagor in writing of the appraised value of theproperty. The appraisal shall be at the mortgagor's expense. (c) <T3>Sale by mortgagor. </T3>Whether or not the mortgage is due and payable,the mortgagor may sell the property for at least the lesser of the mortgagebalance or the appraised value (determined under andSection;206.125(b)).If the mortgage is due and payable at the time the contract for sale isexecuted, the mortgagor may sell the property for at least the lesser ofthe mortgage balance or five percent under the appraised value. The mortgageeshall satisfy the mortgage of record (and the Secretary will satisfy thesecond mortgage required under andSection;206.27(e) of record) in order tofacilitate the sale, provided that there are no junior liens (except themortgage to secure payments by the Secretary under andSection;206.27(e))and all the net proceeds from the sale are paid to the mortgagee. (d) <T3>Initiation of foreclosure. </T3>(1) The mortgagee shall commence foreclosureof the mortgage within three months of giving notice to the mortgagor thatthe mortgage is due and payable, or within such additonal time as may beapproved by the Secretary. (2) If the laws of the State in which the mortgaged property is situateddo not permit the commencement of the foreclosure within three months fromthe date of the notice to the mortgagor that the notice is due and payable,the mortgagee shall commence foreclosure within three months after theexpiration of the time during which such foreclosure is prohibited by suchlaws. (3) The mortgagee shall give written notice to the Secretary within 30days after the initiation of foreclosure proceedings, and shall exercisereasonable diligence in prosecuting such proceedings to conclusion.   (4) The mortgagee shall bid at the foreclosure sale an amount equal tothe appraised value of the property.(e) <T3>Other bidders at foreclosure sale.</T3> If the party other than themortgagee is the successful bidder at the foreclosure sale, the net proceedsof sale shall be applied to the mortgage balance.(f) <T3>Deed in lieu of foreclosure.</T3> (1) In order to avoid delays andadditional expense as a result of instituting and completing a foreclosureaction, the mortgagee shall accept a deed in lieu of foreclosure from themortgagor if the mortgagee is able to obtain good and marketable titlefrom the mortgagor.(2) In exchange for the executed and delivered deed, the mortgagee shallcancel the credit instrument and deliver it to the mortgagor and satisfythe mortgage of record.(g) <T3>Sale of the acquired property.</T3> (1) Upon acquisition of the propertyby foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure, the mortgagee shall makediligent efforts to attempt to sell the property within six months fromthe date the mortagee acquired the property. The mortgagee shall sell theproperty for an amount not less than the appraised value (as provided underparagraph (b) of this section) unless written permission is obtained fromthe Secretary authorizing a sale at a lower price.(2) Repairs shall not exceed those required by local law or the requirementsof the Secretary of HUD or the Secretary of Veterans Affairs if the saleof the property is financed with a mortgage insured by the Secretary ofHUD or guaranteed, insured or taken by the Secretary of Veterans Affairs.(3) The provisions of andSection;204.305(b) of this chapter shall be followedby the mortgagee to avoid conflicts of interest.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.127 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application for insurance benefits.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Mortgagee acquires title.</T3> (1) The mortgagee shall apply for thepayment of the insurance benefits within 15 days after the sale of theproperty by the mortgagee. Application shall be made by notifying the Secretaryof the sale of the property, the sale price, and income and expenses incurredin connection with the acquisition, repair and sale of the property.(2) If the property will not be sold within six months from the date themortagee acquired title, the mortgagee shall, at least 15 days prior tothe expiration of the six month period, request the Secretary to causeanother appraisal of the property to be made. Within 15 days of receiptof the appraisal, the mortgagee shall apply for the insurance benefitsas provided in paragraph (a) of this section, substituting the appraisedvalue for the sale price. The mortgagee shall bear the cost of the appraisal.(b) <T3>Party other than the mortgagee acquires title.</T3> The mortgagee shallapply for the payment of the insurance benefits within 15 days after aparty other than the mortgagee acquires title to the property. Applicationshall be made by notifying the Secretary of the sale of the property andthe sale price.(c) <T3>Mortgagee assigns the mortgage.</T3> The mortgagee shall file its claimfor the payment of the insurance benefits within 15 days after the datethe mortgage is assigned for record to the Secretary. The application forthe payment of the insurance benefits shall include the items listed inandSection;203.351(a) of this chapter and the certification required underandSection;203.353 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.129 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment of claim.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> If the claim for the payment of the insurance benefitsis acceptable to the Secretary, payment shall be made in cash in the amountdetermined under this section.(b) <T3>Limit on claim amount.</T3> In no case may the claim paid under thissubpart exceed the maximum claim amount. The interest allowance providedin paragraphs (d)(2)(iii), (e)(2) and (f)(2) of this section shall notbe included in determining the limit on the claim amount.(c) <T3>Shared appreciation mortgages.</T3> The terms ``mortgage balance''and ``accrued interest'' as used in this section do not include interestattributable to the mortgagee's share of the appreciated value of the property.(d) <T3>Amount of payment_mortgagee acquires title or is unsuccessful bidder.</T3>This paragraph describes the amount of payment if the mortgagee acquirestitle by purchase, foreclosure, or deed in lieu of foreclosure, or whena party other than the mortgagee is the successful bidder at the foreclosuresale.(1) The amount of the claim shall be computed by (i) totalling the mortgagebalance, (including any accrued interest and MIP which have been addedto the mortgage balance) and any accrued interest which have not been addedto the mortgage balance as of the due date (defined in the following sentence),and allowances for items set forth in paragraph (d)(2) of this section,and (ii) subtracting from that total the amount for which the propertywas sold (or the appraised value determined under andSection;206.127(a))and the items set forth in paragraph (d)(3) of this section. ``Due date''means the date when the mortgagee notifies the Secretary under andSection;206.27(c)(1)that the mortgage became due and payable, or, if applicable, the date theSecretary granted approval under andSection;206.27(c)(2) for the mortgageto become due and payable.(2) The claim shall include the following items:(i) Items listed in andSection;203.402(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (g) and (j)of this chapter, and andSection;204.322(l) of this chapter. (ii) Foreclosure costs or costs of acquiring the property actually paidby the mortgagee and approved by the Secretary, in an amount not in excessof two-thirds of such costs or $75.00, whichever is the greater. Costsof acquiring the property otherwise than by foreclosure may include anadditional amount not to exceed $200 paid to the mortgagor for the executionof the deed in lieu of foreclosure. (iii) An amount equal to the interest allowance which would have been earned,from the due date to the date when payment of the claim is made, if theclaim had been paid in debentures, except that when the mortgagee failsto meet any one of the applicable requirements of andSection;andSection;206.125and 206.127 of this subpart within the specified time, and in a mannersatisfactory to the Secretary (or within such further time as the Secretarymay approve in writing), the interest allowance in such cash payment shallbe computed only to the date on which the particular required action shouldhave been taken or to which it was extended. The provisions of andSection;andSection;203.405through 203.411 of this chapter pertaining to debentures are incorporatedby reference. (iv) Costs of any appraisal under andSection;206.127 if not otherwise includedin the mortgage balance. (3) There shall be deducted from the amount computed in paragraph (d)(1)(i)of this section: (i) The items listed in andSection;203.402 of this chapter; and (ii) Any adjustment for damage or neglect to the property pursuant to andSection;andSection;203.378and 203.379 of this chapter. (e) <T3>Amount of payment_assigned mortgages. </T3>This paragraph describesthe amount of payment if the mortgagee assigns a mortgage to the Secretaryunder andSection;206.107(a)(1) or andSection;206.121(b). (1) When a mortgagee assigns a mortgage which is eligible for assignmentunder andSection;206.107(a)(1), the amount of payment shall be computed bysubtracting from the maximum claim amount the items set forth in andSection;203.404(b)of this chapter and any adjustments for damage or neglect to the propertypursuant to andSection;andSection;203.378 and 203.379 of this chapter. (2) The claim shall also include an amount equivalent to the interest allowancewhich would have been earned from the date the mortgage was assigned tothe Secretary to the date the claim is paid, if the claim had been paidin debentures, except that if the mortgagee fails to meet any of the requirementsof andSection;206.127(c), or andSection;206.131 if applicable, within the specifiedtime and in a manner satisfactory to the Secretary (or within such furthertime as the Secretary may approve in writing), the interest allowance inthe payment of the claim shall be computed only to the date on which theparticular required action should have been taken or to which it was extended.The provisions of andSection;andSection;203.405 through 203.411 of this chapterpertaining to debentures are incorporated by reference. (3) When a mortgagee assigns a mortgage under andSection;206.121(b) afterdemand by the Secretary, the mortgagee will not receive the entire claimpayment as contained in paragraphs (e)(1) and (2) of this section. Theamount of the claim shall be computed by (i) totalling the payments madeby the mortgagee to the mortgagor or for the benefit of the mortgagor (includingMIP), and subtracting from the total (ii) the items set forth in andSection;203.404(b)of this chapter and any adjustments for damage or neglect to the propertypursuant to andSection;andSection;203.378 and 203.379 of this chapter. Theclaim shall also be reduced by an amount determined by the Secretary toreimburse the Secretary for administrative expenses incurred in assumingthe mortgagee's responsibility under the mortgage, which may include expensesfor staff time. If more than one mortgage is assigned to the Secretary,the administrative expenses incurred for all the mortgages assigned shallbe allocated among the mortgages as determined by the Secretary. The claimshall not include accrued interest whether or not it has been includedin the mortgage balance. (f) <T3>Amount of payment-mortgagor sells the property. </T3>This paragraphdescribes the amount of payment if the mortgagor sells the property toone other than the mortgagee for less than the mortgage balance, and themortgagee releases the mortgage to facilitate the sale. (1) The amount of the claim shall be computed by (i) totalling the mortgagebalance (including any accrued interest and MIP which have been added tothe mortgage balance) and any accrued interest which has not been addedto the mortgage balance on the date the deed is recorded, and allowancesfor items set forth in paragraphs (d)(2)(i) and (iv) of this section asapplicable, and subtracting from the total (ii) the net proceeds of thesale paid to the mortgagee and the items set forth in paragraph (d)(3)of this section. (2) The claim shall also include an amount equivalent to the interest allowancewhich would have been earned from the date the deed is recorded to thedate when payment of the claim is made, if the claim had been paid in debentures,except that when the mortgagee fails to meet any of the applicable requirementsof andSection;andSection;206.125 and 206.127 of this subpart within the specifiedtime (or within such further time as the Secretary may approve in writing),and in a manner satisfactory to the Secretary, the interest allowance insuch cash payment shall be computed only to the date on which the particularaction should have been taken or to which it was extended. The provisionsof andSection;andSection;203.405 through 203.411 of this chapter pertainingto debentures are incorporated by reference. <ITAG tagnum="84">Condominiums</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.131 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contract rights and obligations for mortgages on individual dwellingunits in a condominium. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Additional requirements. </T3>The requirements of this subpart shallbe applicable to mortgages on individual dwelling units in a condominium,except as modified by this section. (b) <T3>References. </T3>The term ``property'' as used in this subpart shallbe construed to include the individual dwelling unit and the undividedinterest in the common areas and facilities as may be designated. (c) <T3>Assignment of the mortgage. </T3>If the mortgagee assigns the mortgageon the individual dwelling unit to the Secretary, the mortgagee shall certify:(1) To any changes in the plan of apartment ownership including the administrationof the property; (2) That as of the date the assignment is filed for record, the familyunit is assessed and subject to assessment for taxes pertaining only tothat unit; and (3) To the conditions of the property as of the date the assignment isfiled for record. Section 234.275 of this chapter concerning the certificationof condition is incorporated by reference. (d) <T3>Condition of the multifamily structure. </T3>The provisions of andSection;234.270(a) and (b) of this chapter concerning the condition of the multifamilystructure in which the property is located shall be applicable to mortgagesinvolved under this part which are assigned to the Secretary. <ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Termination of Insurance Contract </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.133 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of insurance contract. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Payment of the mortgage. </T3>The contract of insurance shall be terminatedif the mortgage is paid in full. (b) <T3>Acquisition of title. </T3>If the mortgagee or a party other than themortgagee acquires title at a foreclosure sale, or the mortgagee acquirestitle by a deed in lieu of foreclosure, and the mortgagee notifies theSecretary that a claim for the payment of the insurance benefits will notbe presented, the contract of insurance shall be terminated. (c) <T3>Mortgagee fails to make payments. </T3>If the mortgagee fails to makethe payments to the mortgagor as required under the mortgage, and doesnot reimburse the Secretary or assign the mortgage to the Secretary within30 days from the demand by the Secretary for reimbursement or assignment,the contract of insurance shall automatically terminate. The Secretarymay later reinstate the contract of insurance, which shall continue inforce as if no termination had occurred, upon reimbursement with interestas provided in andSection;206.121. Upon reinstatement, the mortgagee shallbe liable for all MIP which would have been due if no termination had occurred,including late charge and interest as provided in andSection;206.113. (d) <T3>Notice of termination. </T3>The mortgagee shall give written noticeto the Secretary within 15 days of the occurrence of an event under paragraphs(a) and (b) of this section. No contract of insurance shall be terminatedunder paragraphs (a) or (b) of this section unless such notice is given.(e) <T3>Voluntary termination. </T3>The mortgagor and the mortgagee may jointlyrequest the Secretary to approve the voluntary termination of the mortgageinsurance contract. Prior to approval, the Secretary shall make certainthat the mortgagor is aware of the consequences which could arise out ofthe voluntary termination of the contract of insurance. The provisionsof andSection;203.295 of this chapter concerning voluntary termination shallapply when a contract of insurance under this part is voluntarily terminated.(f) <T3>Effect of termination. </T3>Upon termination of the contract of insurance,the obligation to pay any subsequent MIP shall cease and all rights ofthe mortgagor and mortgagee shall be terminated except as otherwise providedin this part. <ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="50">Subpart D_Servicing Responsibilities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Mortgage servicing generally; sanctions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>This subpart identifies servicing practices that theSecretary considers acceptable mortgage servicing practices of lendinginstitutions servicing mortgages insured by the Secretary. Failure to complywith this subpart shall not be a basis for denial of the insurance benefits,but a pattern of refusal or failure to comply will be cause for withdrawalof HUD mortgagee approval. (b) <T3>Importance of timely payments. </T3>The paramount servicing responsibilityis the need to make timely payments in full as required by the mortgage.Any failure of a mortgagee to make all payments required by the mortgagein a timely manner will be grounds for administrative sanctions authorizedby regulations, including Part 24 (Debarment, Suspension and Limited Denialof Participation), and Part 25 (Mortgagee Review Board). (c) <T3>Responsibility for servicing. </T3>The provisions of andSection;203.502of this chapter pertaining to the responsibility for servicing shall applyto mortgages insured under this part, except that references in that sectionto payments by a mortgagor shall mean payments to the mortgagor. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Providing information. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Annual statement. </T3>The mortgagee shall provide to the mortgagoran annual statement regarding the activity of the mortgage for each calendaryear. The statement shall summarize the total principal amount for theyear which has been paid to the mortgagor under the mortgage, the MIP paidto the Secretary and charged to the mortgagor, the total amount of deferredinterest added to the mortgage balance, the total mortgage balance andthe current principal limit. If the mortgagor has elected to have the mortgageepay property charges pursuant to andSection;206.205, the mortgagee shallinclude an accounting of all payments for property charges for the year.The statement shall be provided to the mortgagor no later than January31 for each preceding year until the mortgage is paid in full by the mortgagor.(b) <T3>Line of credit and payment change statements. </T3>The mortgagee shallprovide the mortgagor with a statement of the account every time a lineof credit payment is made under the line of credit payment option or froma line of credit set aside, and every time that monthly payments are recalculated.The Secretary shall specify the required information to be included inthe statement. (c) <T3>Servicing. </T3>The provisions of andSection;203.508 (a) and (b) of thischapter pertaining to loan information to mortgagors shall also be applicableto mortgages insured under this part. The mortgagee, as part of the informationrequired under andSection;203.508(b) of this chapter, shall provide the mortgagorwith the name of the mortgagee's employee who has been specifically designatedto respond to inquiries concerning mortgages insured under this part. Suchinformation shall be provided annually and whenever the servicer or thedesignated employee changes. <ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number2528-0133) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Property charges. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The mortgagor shall pay all property charges consistingof taxes, ground rents, flood and hazard insurance premiums, and assessmentsin a timely manner and shall provide evidence of payment to the mortgageeas required in the mortgage. (b) <T3>Election. </T3>A mortgagor may elect to require the mortgagee to payproperty charges by withholding funds from monthly payments due to themortgagor or by charging such funds to a line of credit. The mortgagormay make or rescind such an election at any time. If the sum of the mortgagebalance and any unused set asides for repairs has reached the principallimit or the mortgage funds are otherwise insufficient to pay the propertycharges, the mortgagor shall pay such items as provided in paragraph (a)of this section, even though the mortgagor elected payment to be made bythe mortgagee. (c) <T3>Mortgagor's failure to make payments. </T3>If the mortgagor fails topay the property charges in a timely manner, and has not elected to havethe mortgagee make the payments, the mortgagee may make the payment forthe mortgagor and charge the mortgagor's account. If a pattern of missedpayments occurs, the mortgagee may establish procedures to pay the propertycharges from the mortgagor's funds as if the mortgagor elected to havethe mortgagee pay the property charges under this section. (d) <T3>Assignment of mortgage to the Secretary. </T3>If the insured firstmortgage is assigned to the Secretary under andSection;206.107(c)(1) or andSection;206.121(b),or if payments are made through the second mortgage under andSection;206.121(c),the Secretary is not required to assume the mortgagee's responsibilityunder paragraph (b) of this section, despite the election by the mortgagor.(e) <T3>Mortgagee's responsibilities. </T3>(1) Funds withheld from paymentsdue to the mortgagor for property charges under paragraph (b) of this sectionshall not be paid into an escrow account. When property charges are actuallypaid, the mortgagee may add the amount paid to the mortgage balance. (2) It is the mortgagee's responsibility to make disbursements for propertycharges before bills become delinquent. Mortgagees must establish controlsto ensure that the information needed to pay such bills is obtained ona timely basis. Penalties for late payments for property charges must notbe charged to the mortgagor unless it can be shown that the penalty wasthe direct result of the mortgagor's error or omission. Early payment ofa bill to take advantage of a discount should be made whenever it is tothe mortgagor's benefit. (3) Not later than the end of the second loan year the mortgagee shallestablish a system for the periodic analysis of the amounts withheld frommonthly payments. The analysis shall be performed at least once a yearthereafter. The amount shall be adjusted, after analysis, to provide sufficientavailable funds to make anticipated disbursements during the ensuing year.The mortgagor shall be given at least ten days notice of adjustment inthe amount of withholding and an adequate explanation of the reasons forany change. When the amount withheld is analyzed in accordance with thisparagraph, any surplus shall be paid to the mortgagor and added to themortgage balance. Any shortage shall be corrected through increasing themonthly withholding as provided in paragraph (e)(4) of this section. Ifamounts withheld are insufficient to pay a property charge before it isdelinquent, and the mortgagor could request a payment equal to the shortageunder andSection;206.26(c), then the mortgagee shall pay the full propertycharge and treat payment of the shortage as a payment requested by themortgagor under andSection;206.26(c). (4) The mortgagee's estimate of withholding amount shall be based on thebest information available as to probable payments which will be requiredto be made for property charges in the coming year. If actual disbursementsduring the preceding year are used as the basis, the resulting estimatemay deviate from those disbursements by as much as ten percent. The mortgageemay not require withholding in excess of the current estimated total annualrequirement, unless expressly requested by the mortgagor. Each monthlywithholding for property charges shall equal one-twelfth of the annualamounts as reasonably estimated by the mortgagee. (f) <T3>Set aside for first year property charges. </T3>If the mortgagor electsto require the mortgagee to pay property charges and to receive paymentsunder the term or tenure payment option, then the mortgagee shall set asideat closing a portion of the principal limit that will be sufficient topay such items for the period beginning in the last date on which eachsuch charge would have been paid under the normal lending practices ofthe mortgagee and local custom (if each such date constitutes prudent lendingpractice), and ending in the due date of the first monthly payment to themortgagor. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.207 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allowable charges and fees after endorsement. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Reasonable and customary charges. </T3>The mortgagee may collect reasonableand customary charges and fees from the mortgagor after insurance endorsementby adding them to the mortgage balance, but only for: Items listed in andSection;203.552(a)(6), (9), (11) and (13) of this chapter; items authorized by the Secretaryunder andSection;203.552(a)(12) of this chapter or as provided at andSection;206.26(d);or charges and fees related to additional documents described in andSection;206.27(b)(10).(b) <T3>Servicing charges. </T3>The mortgagee may collect a fixed monthly chargefor servicing activities of the mortgagee or servicer if (1) the chargeis authorized by the Secretary, (2) the charge is disclosed as requiredby andSection;206.43 to the mortgagor in a manner acceptable to the Secretaryat the time the mortgagee provides the mortgagor with a loan application,(3) amounts to pay the charge are set aside as a portion of the principallimit, and (4) the charge is payable only from the set aside. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.209 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prepayment. </ITAG>(a) <T3>No charge or penalty. </T3>The mortgagor may prepay a mortgage in fullor in part without charge or penalty. (b) <T3>Tenure or term option. </T3>When payments are being made under theterm or tenure option, a mortgage may be prepaid at any time and the provisionsof andSection;203.558 (a), (c), and (e) of this chapter shall be followedin handling a prepayment of such a mortgage insured under this part, exceptthat the term ``installment due date'' shall mean the date of paymentsto the mortgagor instead of payments by the mortgagor. (c) <T3>Line of credit option. </T3>When payments are being made under theline of credit option, a mortgage may be prepaid after giving two weeksnotice to the mortgagee. If the mortgagee accepts the prepayment withouttwo weeks notice, interest may be charged on the prepaid amount for a twoweek period after the date of notice. Otherwise, no interest shall be chargedon the prepaid amount after the date of prepayment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;206.211 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual determination of principal residence. </ITAG>At least once during each calendar year, the mortgagee shall determinewhether or not the property is the principal residence of at least onemortgagor. The mortgagee shall require each mortgagor to make an annualcertification of his or her principal residence, and the mortgagee mayrely on the certification unless it has information indicating that thecertification may be false. <ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: June 2, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Jack Kemp, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-13639 Filed 6-8-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4210-32-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>